
// Import Discord.js
const {
    Client,
    Collection,
    GatewayIntentBits,
    Partials,
    EmbedBuilder
} = require('discord.js');
const { token } = require('./config.json');

const client = new Client({
    intents: [
        Guilds,
        GuildMembers, // IMPORTANT
        GuildMessages,
        MessageContent
    ],
    partials: [
        User,
        Channel,
        Message,
        GuildMember // IMPORTANT
    ],
});

let prefix = '!';

client.once('ready', () => {

client.on('guildMemberAdd', async (GuildMember) => {
console.log(GuildMember); // View the member data

});

const random = (min, max) => {
    return Math.floor(Math.random() * (max - min + 1) + min);
  }
  
const sendRandomMsg = () => {
  
      client.channels.cache.get('1006941719666905089').send(randomMsg[random(0, randomMsg.length - 1)]);
}
  
    setInterval(function(){ sendRandomMsg() }, 1000 * 60 );


const randomMsg = ['1. TIPPY TAPPY. IT happened. We cant change that now. Time takes time. T tips t. T______T whales sleep in the seen images of long forgotten teens skinned alive for their gumption and startup. Oil? For the hash lamps to light the small corner you hide yourself in when you think the jury is out on your chat badges. Silver? For the ingot. Gold? For my teeth to shine like the razors edge of blinding blades fighting glory for The Sword. Go. March 15, 2016', '2. TIME. These fools always forgot about time. Thats why sticky wickets end up with heeby jeebys. Nobody ever took the time anymore. It was Memorial Day weekend. The kids need help with their schoolwork. Adulting. Jun 5, 2018', '3. POTABLES. On and on and on the song it goes. No one knows. Paradise. All these things Ive done. And she is there. Where? So long away makes the boy a tad grumpy and he makes a tantrum seem so fitting. Up and down. Round and flat. Across the door and down the throat with the key. He will not boast but he does not want it to hurt again like it did last time. No more pain, he begs. No more tears, he cries. No matter: the love wont play by his rules. It never did. Dec 26, 2015', '4. SHAMROCK. It was transparent, now, his anger. It leapt from his body and danced around him in the night, begging for attention, really. It would poke and prod him for a hope to rile up some sort of attention worth a scrape on a board or perhaps a slap and a tickle. He dreamed and anger slapped him awake to make him atone. His life was angers doorstep, and more guests were coming, believe me. Now the gritted teeth started to dissolve in their positions. Grit and sand would cover the floor sometimes when he stood at the refrigerator pondering what to eat next. Why had anger waited so long and grabbed hold so tightly? To be angry at a wisp of air before you and none the wiser why you hadnt closed up shop ages ago was what he wondered now. This anger was scary. It had no body. This anger was uncontrollable. It had no form. This anger would never leave him alone. He knew that now. Dec 23, 2015', '5. MSIR. In between playing he did a do. It was made of goo. It crept fro and to. Never the wiser mods stacked maps of cannon fodder in the basement of a shack in New Delhi. Sep 10, 2019', '6. MAFIA. This is a mafia, this is a mafia. This is a mafia, that is a battleground. We are slabs of meat, they are the seasoning This is a mafia, this is a mafia. I am a slab of meat, the spit is a warm cocoon This is a mafia, this is a mafia. Thugs run rampant, punks guard the outskirts This is a mafia, the skippers call the shots Trapped in a rat race until the buck stops. May 7, 2018', '7. WATER TABLES. Now the memories. The promises. The lock and key. Both returned. Both unbroken but somehow lacking in purpose. Organized and stacked, all should be back to how it was before the storm, the second coming. Wind and rain left the place a mess. He could clean up but that would just make it easier for the third and fourth and devils are already knocking down the door again. Such a pretty pear with such a poisoned core. Jan 1, 2015', '8. VOHIYO. A metallic musty scent of death is amply protected though the gates are in shambles the roads are a gamble weaving around in here will wind you up dead or at least in dead company. That unfamiliar smell on the winds breath can be misconstrued and labeled death. Honeysuckle and metal on metal smell overhead with a sprinkle of coal from the payloads heft of a train gliding by on the left of Landreth and verbals plot thats kept well-manicured the grass is still wet. May 7, 2018', '9. SLAVERY. Of love? Let my love go. My love can do as she pleases with whom she pleases. Love must be personal slavery. You must lock yourself to the post and swallow the key and pray that you are worthy of the love you imagine. The love you find. Let the love come find you then, again, and again, and again. Each time will be love again, and again, and again. My love takes my reigns when she pleases. Dec 10, 2015', '10. LA NEGRESSE BLONDE. La negresse blonde. Golden fish? Smooth and supple lines. Meeting in the rear. Where are women usually found? Janitors closets next to faucets The blonde negress. But I digress. A golden fish? On a pedestal. Her form is square. Not a tussle of hair. Black scarf on blonde fish A golden fish? May 7, 2018', '11. TACOS. Hobos and tacos. Off from the herds. Baying and testing. Down to the curbs. To walk in long strides. No talking, feelings inside. Across the well-manicured lawn Walking into the left towards dawn In search of kelp tacos and prawn With a whiff of vagrant piss. The espresso station and pawn. May 7, 2018', '14. ÆNIMA. He dreamt of it. The final reset. A trinket he carried in his pocket for sunny days so as to dash any hope of arrant play. He knew he was a lame duck and he felt smug in knowing better than the rest. It was too cataclysmic not to shake the foundation of a home. The batons were out to ward off any suitors and he kept a close watch on the study for nightly constitutionals with the brainchild. His machinations in the night didnt coalesce like others do. In the night his study is with the witchs brew. Feb 1, 2019', '15. OVERLOOK. At the corner where nigh meets nigh... An eye met and eye and for a time the two were at a crossing of roads The time ticked by and-by-and rhyme echoed through the streets from the loudspeaker of an ice cream vendor. May 7, 2018', '16. SINGER POP. Back to the drawing board. Everyday. Failure. Everyday. Boredom. Everyday. What happened to my amazing life? I wouldnt have gone to jail for you. That was my limit. I learned that now. I couldnt bend the rules like that. I couldnt lie on a dotted line for a stack of cash. So were through? You just left me there. You said "too sick". You said "too much". It hurt. It cut. There are marks now; I see them every day. It hurts. EVERY. TIME. Jan 20, 2016', '17. A FINGER... It can be bold. It can be brash. It can be cute. It can be crass. But a finger points you.It may point up. It may point down. It may be black. It may be brown. But a finger anoints you. Sometimes its just one. Sometimes its a few. Sometimes its random, sometimes on cue. But a finger has joints too. I just found a finger, I think it has wings. A finger in my soup. Sometimes it sings. "I give the finger to YOU" All these fingers and all I wanted was safe. All these fingers but none of them just WAIT. Jan 12, 2015', '18. OKEY DOKEY ARTICHOKEY. He hid in plain sight. He told who he could what he could; what he could comprehend about what had happened to him; what he had seen. He thought he was smarter than that. He didnt know that people did that. He hadnt seen that trick. He got fooled, a lot actually. He was really bad at carrying out what he wanted for himself. He touched his knee to the ground just to make sure it was there, a nervous tick. He knew he was not allowed to tell. He did anyway, how else would they lay as he did. To make sense of it here and there at the same time couldnt happen. He couldnt stand in this room and simultaneously be another; it was impossible. No one would do that there, no one would be that foolish; that hungry; that sick; that distraught. May 2, 2018', '19. NEO GENESIS. Tippy tappy; at the weirdest of hours. And to whom? For what end? No one will save him here. just jackal and hyena. Laughing and yipping as they search the badlands for more game to feed the insatiable hungers of their own. It wont be long now before the packs start in on him. First, they will sniff him out when he tries to bed down with one of the mating types. Thats always his weakness. Looking for "her". Then theyll encircle him when he lets his guard down and head in on him not long after the water starts to dew just before sunrise. Jump him in the morning. Steal his valuables. Slap and beat his face. Itll teach him, yet again, not to trust so easily. But hell forget. Hell cry again. Hell nurse his wounds. The sun will rise. All will be as it should. No emergency broadcast will go out alerting the masses to anything amiss. Just another fallen errand boy. But for what means; there cant be much value in beating a dead horse these days. The guys had his fair share of heartbreak. I hope they go easy on him. Or at least kill him this time. Jan 8, 2015', '20. TOMORROW. Always a day away. Left for the next day. Why? Life is today. Life is now. Why can I have her today? Why wait until tomorrow to grow. To improve. Sitting and stewing about my broken body wont heal the wounds. Work will heal the wounds. Toil will leave troughs for the seeds. Water, my God, water you fool, not the fructose. The starches. The new year is upon us. Tomorrow you get out of bed and fight the demons in your bedroom. Shadowbox. Pick it up. Put it down. Move around again. No one loves the sloth. No one needs an extra bag. You cant save her if you dont save yourself first. Get out of bed. Make the covers. Brush your teeth. Try again. And again. And again, I say, to get a that job. Failure isnt an option; its guaranteed at this point. You will fail MANY more times. You must embrace failure. You studied the failures. The yielding. The stresses. How could you think they would be absent from your life? The forcing function is always there. Never a day will pass without the mass-spring-damper problem square in your sights. You must be the mass, attack the spring, and ride the damper. This is your last tomorrow. Tomorrow is a tired excuse. Jan 22, 2016', '21. ᕙ(⇀‸↼‵‵)ᕗ Half salmon legs 1 half lemon, 1 half lime, two parts Flay out legs, salt two times on each side Ginger with the paprika please; a dash of the Mrs. and were off to the grill, cleaned and greased liberally Cooked on high then forgot for some time, maybe 10 and then add 9 on the other side dont forget the Wasabi; just kidding, just soy and sesame; 1 half lemon, 1 half lime two parts. Vinegar for the daring soul, painted on the ribs and eyelids liberally while searing the fat. Cook the spectrum and gorge the lot. May 6, 2018', '22. HIP HOP. Just for her, he said time and time again. Just when it meant something again. Only for the serpent. Flicking and laughing his tail and tongue in one movement. Gulping the poisons. Calming the storm. God the storms he had seen... and been. Why now all quiet on the western front? Many more needed food. Many more needed hands. Where were his countrymen now but lost in the waves of overstimulation and ogling the cat and mouse prey game that hailed their fancy. MY men. MY women. MY comrades. Where had they been for so long, he lulled now in their absence. The fervor only came to him now on solemn rides home from the market or in dreams his family and doctors had deemed agenda suicide; he chose "the ether". Rambled again and to work for the pen. No more lying about and waiting for life to balls up and make a man out of him. Mar 7, 2016', '23. TRIBULATIONS. Back. Forward. To the left. Again, with feeling. These will be my new mottos. Never again will I doze at my post. My post is for standing and surveying the lay of the land. To gain an upper hand of some sort in this battle, this war of our worlds. Now back to shoveling and piling this shit that needs to be moved. Never think of the end of the stack. The stack is for mending of the mind while at your post. Freedom from your post is only illusionary. Post after post after post will be my fate now as time drags me down by the pin on my breast. I have reached into the sand and pulled the pieces I so desperately pined for and now I must deal with their tremendous weight. My shirt rips at the pin engagement and my back is sore from holding so fast the weight of this man I must now become. I have all the pieces now. Funny, to be so alone yet so fortified. To be defeated yet free. Disheveled, depressed, and graduated. Like a real man. Mar 5, 2016', '24. \(._. )/It was a cold January. The wind whipped the warmth right out of your fingertips and the vestibule apartment was alone and disheveled. The rotgut of heartbreak panging every beat of the heart fluxing life to an old body of paper mache and candy corn worked out of the gumdrop mine for safe keeping. Little one, now we carry the trinkets of a sailor in the galaxies she made up in her gown of yellow and box of gold.Feb 1, 2019', '25. GAWD. And then as soon as he had found him, he lost him in the murky muck of it all. Of game hype, of sense, of the logic. He was gone and never to return, it seemed. Lost like a child he pawed and clamored for something familiar to rouse him back to the place he had found there before. But for not, gawd was gone. Mar 12, 2016', '26. TEMPTED. He waited with bated breath sometimes in the afternoon, just after work. Writing for the sake of finding a treasure trove of meaning in the mess of it all. It was too easy now. Everything had fallen into place in a horribly mundane existence. He wrote now to push some breath back into the old familiar life he had given up on. Beats of his old bleeding heart kept the tick tock ticking but no one believed the old thing would do much anymore. Mar 22, 2016', '27. DIVING. So he jumped. It blasted things forward for a bit. Things whizzed and the world warped around a point in the very front of his head about 12 inches in front of his nose. Whirling and whipping the cosmic soup showed him a fast forward of the world and he reveled in it. In this space the world didnt make sense, but things were supposed to add up in the end. The calculation was there but he didnt care what the final solution really was. He did it for the jumble. He already knew the solution long before he hoped into it. There was no solution. There were no happy endings. Things would not fall out as they should have. May 13, 2016', '28. SHORTY. Scribbles etched all about amused him. He liked the tidbits in succinct morsels at times; others he wanted them on playback and looping modules to layer the cake. It was a good cake. It smelled of barbecue sauce and ached of restlessness. It was good for him. He liked the temperament of the market, salty with a wick of glory. May 15, 2016', '29. ANOTHER NIGHT AWAKE.... Dreams dont come to the weary. Desolate landscapes paint portraits of mistletoe and makeup on the glory days of a washed-up has-been. Nary a glob of solder to cool and wick with a temperature of agreeable sequestered in the study. The temperament of our party would be much more kept abreast of the foreseeable future under a rock out of sight and never bothered about present day and its composition. Ready the sails! Theres game afoot! Nary a rabble rouser could give up the chance to belly up and whine on next fortnight nigh. The sea was choppy with gumption of nary a sailor on the deep blue. Jun 13, 2018', '30. (◕_◕ ✿)EVERYTHING YOU EAT TURNS INTO POOP. So now I add “scab” to my repertoire, I suppose. All the while dodging the “big boys” who smile real big on camera. Maybe Ill be stabbed like that poor guy on Dalton a few years back. Lucky for me I have a car, otherwise theyd root me out trying to sneak around alone in a city this short and crooked. Now I “fear” the water baroness; the “hard working black woman”. How dare I infringe on sleep; the bastards already made me need trazodone for mine, to silence the voices; the constant daydreams of my picaresque flaying. Ill admit, I did make it pretty easy for them; I write pretty clear English. Now to work on my Spanish, Italian, Russian; all preparing for when they eventually lock me up, I suppose. I really thought you could trust people you invited into your home. Silly me, just gangs that need their penance. Now Im a book-e for my own food and water, at least. May 1, 2018', '31. GOBBLEDEEGOOK. The mines smelt of loneliness. No pebble and gumdrop machinery at the ready for some chat worth a damn in the open sea mechanics with donger machine capable of swings in upset betting on multiple occasions with TEEX88. Nov 11, 2017', '32. AND HE WROTE AGAIN. It was a dark night. Darker than most had been in the candlelight of messed up feelings. Heebee jeebees. Everybodys got problems. Now yours are just out like a mess on the floor. Better for the wiser me and wont get burned so hot next time like that. Im picking up my feet. Im brushing my teeth. No one can keep this kid down if they tried. Every day is a new chance. Jul 9, 2016', '33. WRITING took hold sometimes. It came in the evenings where dreams left little to the imagination. Time was a didgeridoo, billowing a low soft soliloquy for the masses. It ticked with a beat and made sense as it should have. The signature was long and languid. The beats big and small at the same time. Time stamps were normal now. Packs of wild animals grazed fields of the multiplex and chattered about the weather. It made sense when you shrunk it down to the size of quarter. The group got along okay in the dead of nights and made architecture in pylons of cyberspace. May 11, 2018', '34. MARTYRDOMME. She wrecked. She whipped. Tables tipped and bowed. The china gave her away when she walked in from a hard day of work and it made him nervous to have such a valuable thing at his fingertips. So, he shadow boxed. He wrapped and rapped about it with his cohorts. The rooms fumed. The doors were blown off. Chaos. Jan 30, 2015', '35. SEEN. Once seen, things rarely go back to the way they once were. If you let the cat out of the bag does the bag need? What use is anything to anyone anymore? All I see in my world is sleight of hand for skittles and peanuts. I tire of the games we humans play. I long for someone. I rot in my cage quite petulantly. Where have all the people gone? May 16, 2016', '36. SOON. The shudders. Jolts of electricity fluxing through a wire to drive a sound so boisterous it split metal with the heat of a knife. Billowing through the air the sound shook small objects not affixed or heavier than a half dollar. A temperature change was only noticeable to the accustomed few to the higher-level derivations in laboratory experiments throughout the years we rocked on this precipice in time and space. Dec 27, 2016', '37. STRICKEN. Down to the table. To wipe the sweet, a dew they kempt for forgetting all about the time at all for realz. Time was kept on dinkering machine of pebbles and cane. Rock and roll ladies and gentlemen. Nov 18, 2016', '38. CHAPTER 3.14. And then it was boshy time. Time held still but young table-toppers took heed. The salt was on the table and the table was being flipped. Things were a real sticky wicket, but they got along okay. The flipping had begun last yesteryear and the salt lay all across the floor for hours. A lick? For funzies they said boshy and got weak with the stuff. Umbrellas couldnt keep the children safe from the sheer weight of it all. The salt had been specially fabricated to taste sweeter than actual table salt, but people still died from over-stimulation on the weekends. "Mods" were needed to make sure shovel loads of the stuff didnt clog the conveyor belt system that shipped it in. Every Thursday night at 3:14 a new salt depository was commissioned, and it was shipped by a young whippersnapper by the name of L0Ljk. Young L0Ljk made it clear that the salt would be kept safe. Safe from the dirty table-flippers of yester weeks. Aug 18, 2016', '39. TINKER. And the boat will rock eventually. Name yourself amongst the mass media exploitation of our world and you might shake out alright. The walls never stacked higher. The sound would climb up to them at times, billowing from its reprieve. He didnt understand the tides of the current that lapped water against his boat in the night. Jun 3, 2018', '40. JERRY TIME. Sometime inclinations moved his very soul. He couldnt explain it. His life was important just not now; not like it was. This gamer corner was his only reprieve. It smelled of loneliness and soiled sheets. To access it was normal, he told himself. A gut reaction to feelings of hopelessness and too much sleep. It rolled die. It got the ball rolling. It sounded like life. Oct 29, 2017', '41. BLOBEDY BLOOP. It took hold at times of gasp. Of wonder. GivePLZ ItsBoshyTime TakeNRG. It made sense code word as well as elucidated response (◕_◕ ✿) ORLY? Things made sense in a long tab ridden gobbldygooked mess of chat windows and streaming services. Facebook included. Oct 9, 2017', '42. IT MADE SENSE. The monotony of game time betting and YouTube clips got boring sometimes. He paused occasionally to contemplate the meaning of it all sometimes. But then another spin at the wheel of luck to try and become a salty champion. That was the dream. To be something that mattered to these halfwit degenerates that cruised the SaltyBet chat room; that was the end goal. Sep 2, 2017', '43. ┬─┬ ( /(.□. \) Your silver box is empty left and wanting, I want your... with my eyes closed the beat just flows through me my eyes show tattered lines I want the...Splattered lines, everything feels so disgusting but the water tastes so clean Your dog is no more interested in the Benjamins than me I can still see, my breath. May 5, 2018', '44. STUCK IN TAFFY. He reveled in it for a while. Riding the streets, he would purposefully speed up, accelerate if you will, to the posted speed limit, velocity as it were, sometimes, in his musings. But occasionally the thoughts began to swarm him up at times. He would have stupors of sleeplessness that his family had deemed “the ether” and off to bed with you. Perhaps to the doctor to tell you whats the matter in your head. But within this acceleration he witnessed a time rate of change of his environment that painted a precarious predicament in the Iran/Anonymous/ Prism crisis of 2000-2014 and continuing. We have been going strong now, ever since I heard it from the streets. This entire nation is a hypocrisy enumeration of the continued exploitation of the mass media explanation. The resultant market fluctuations are the only condemnations of the worldwide federation that keep circuit integration. Nothing wrong at all; thanks for the free parking. But circuits lead to wires. A wire holds down in these kinds of spots. You gotta be patient. Let the waves come to you. Its not “ride it out” so much as it is “dont rock the boat”. But they hit me in the back of the head anyway. Current runs strong in my wire line. They take em all down together. No need to worry, the current picks up somewhere else and does something electrical. Incandescent. The spectacles are on again this evening. Come watch with me. It would be nice without the kids... Oh, there it is again. Well, I appreciated being the topic of conversation for a bit. Lets see; I saved us countless mistakes and so much money in this economy. You know I cant work until next year. Yeah, turns out thats what they do to people like me; the wireless. I swear, I dont know what that means. Could you try explaining it to me again? Apr 18, 2018', '45. ┬─┬ (  ゚- ゚ノ) Doin 5 hour energy in the bathroom stall studying science bouncing off the walls taggings the walls with clear coat spray takin on the government, what the hay what ya say heard what ya did cant help but say Id do the same but in a different way takin on the government what ya say? May 7, 2018', '47. LESS SUGAR MORE WATER. Things made sense when time up and gave a dime. Doodling all day made the next different. Things didnt always stack up in the end when card counts go around the table every Tuesday. A tender touch of misunderstanding mixed with Alka seltzer washed away the feelings of desperation earlier in the day. Aug 19, 2018', '48. CROW COUNTING RHYME. One for sorrow. Two for mirth. Three for a wedding and Four for a birth Five for silver. Six for gold and Seven for a secret never to be told The 7 crows lay waste to the siege. None left but the crept bodies. Jun 16, 2018', '51. YESTERDAY. The day called for musing. It was scrawled on walls all around the place. Memories. Incantations. Prayers. It was a daily marking. To aid in nodding at your post. The sleepy campers danced in parties organized by the fathers and mothers of upstart doodlers. The lamps lit a little gathering by the woods. "Do you dance?" "Only every once in a while." "Dare to mosey with me in a spectacle around the floor and glance at the never- ending onion of despair?" "Certainly" Dec 26, 2019', '52. NEVER BET. It gets you into trouble in the long run. The running tab ends you up in the salt mines to be peddling this shit around like a common waiter. BibleThump. Sep 11, 2017', '54. ERICA. Eyes. For him, hers. In a jar, if he must. But behind your glasses is too much. “You will sit and look me in the eyes for many a night.” He breathed a sigh, kissed her, and wrapped his hands tightly around her all at the same time. “Eyes.” “MINE” Apr 29, 2018', '55. ʕง •`ᴥ ́•ʔっ)- ゚ The titans came in. Touted their wares and devil may care as the rabble lapped it up. A knife and ginny in his keepsake the stalker darted through the night and clipped the little nobs that grew in the garden kept for the home. Jan 20, 2019', '56. ┬┴┬┴┤(・_├┬┴┬┴ He thought about them; the people that taunted him. He didnt understand it and he didnt want to. Crossfire? Jealousy? Fear? He felt safe; he just mourned for the loss of his idealism. He thought he could change things. He thought he was smart. He thought he made himself clear with his actions. Unfortunately, the world didnt care. He couldnt change anyones mind, so he just jumped in; let the water carry him. Would it take him somewhere nice? Most likely not. He feared the outside world. He longed for simplicity; someone to let their guard down and tell him how to succeed but he was alone. He hadnt realized how alone until his family shut him out; told him he was crazy. He stopped telling them things; for their own good, really. He didnt want them to worry. He didnt want them to know about the demons he wrestled, the stories he told himself. Plus, he knew how to keep himself and others safe from his “condition”. He simply couldnt save anyone from the boogeymen; the cell phone salesmen; the politicians; the narcs. He knew he wasnt military, and he knew he wasnt a cop; other than that, he didnt know whose side he was on. He thought he was a good person but so far, he wasnt able to find many others, or so he thought. What did he know? He was no saint. He had needs. He had weaknesses of the flesh and mind. He made mistakes. Sometimes he completely forgot himself and had to stop dead in his tracks, retrace his short-term memory, and often he just gave up and moved on. May 2, 2018', '57. ┌( ಠ‿ಠ)┘ What word file is this most compatible storage medium. How do I enunciate this distrust me sitting here uncomfortably you making me sign in for all these tediums. I feel as though the water could just up and drink me and you for us piddling here Well were all here scribble there were all aware and proud you choose us as your guinea pigs. The crosshairs will be theirs when news blares about your rigs up to the sky Up so high Up in the sky unable to b dry the air allies now look in my eyes and tell your social security number. May 7, 2018', '58.ᕙ[͒ _͒ ]ᕗ This jobs a little too "puttin on the Ritz", not enough shrimp and grits for this here mohair walkin up to your basement. Clouds my judgement, taste buds askin for a shrimp and grits meal ticket on the "ever-line" train, but the bison mass at the next stations got me sick again, said I dont wanna sell you a stay, gonna go my own way, maybe Ill see ya next stop on the next mountain range. Aint it strange how well we all end up here, afraid to speak our minds and the stench just up and grabs your senses till it shakes you senseless then youll be rollin on quarters, bettin your last dime before the train line goes straight again. We gotta make it to the plains, son, thats where the game begins. Crumple your dollars for a makeshift pillow no one wins a long shot in the dark poorly dressed on the "ever-line" (train). Your hat scared me somethin awful You had me battin Zimmermans ghost again the way the crest of that tattered bill droops over your curls and makes a face where there ought not be one. Dusted light painted on a bright silhouette formed down around your eyes. Yeah, a good meal would do me right tuckered and tired Id sleep rather then fight up this pillow stuffing I got for eyelids, besides got nothin left to rattle on about. May 6, 2018', '59. HICCUP. SPACEMOUSE! THE ADVENTUER THROUGH TIME AND SPACE HE WAS SUBDUED TO XRAYS AFTER HIS O WNERS BALLOON BASKET MISSION SENT HIM FAR AB OVE OUR OWN STRATOSPHERE. Jul 21, 2018', '60. (゚д゚≡゚д゚) They like to talk over you They like to talk oer the rabble of your glasses. They listen to diamond encrusted glassware in between park place cab fares whats another rattle as you battle up the stairs. Long legs trip. Their boot heels flip. Soot in your eyes. A tear may drip But loot tendrils scaaaaaaaaaaaarrrrrrrre meeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee The bottom line isssss Better than these bottom feedeeeeerrrrrrrzzzzz We, the working class We are cleaning the glass, drink up bitches You are all lambs to MY martyr, YOU have NOTHING left to offerrrrrr Public speaking makes my ear drums drip these boot heels flip YOU are not so special ID say you make me sick But workers compensation wouldnt cover these scars Plus they would test me for sars and my echinacea regiment is wearing thin. May 5, 2018', '61. ᕙᓄ(☉ਊ☉)ᓄᕗ I cant handle this life, she said as she walked away as if that would somehow dull the pain. Both half cooked his apathy made his eyes flutter with the tired mind of a traveler not yet lost but at what cost? She stammered and stuttered I cant handle this life. They were both half cooked and left the raw split ends May 6, 2018', '62. ヽ! ಠ益ಠ " And if you find yourself on the wrong side of the rabble dont forget Rocketops castle. They make believe that the place is haunted but thats because many fear and misunderstand it. But for sure if one finds oneself on the wrong side of many, it is a good place to make yourself disappear with none the wiser. The winding halls that run up 15 vaulted flights of old oak stairs can tire out even the most desperate tracker/pursuer up & up & up & up youll go... all to you owe the fear and disillusionment of your escape. Each floor brings more; would be captures just closed behind your fleeting door. Breathing and coughing youll scarcely believe this stairway to the cloud holds for you any reprieve you can scarcely believe that so many club footed clowns could be after you and out for your hide strewn out, flayed as a centerpiece above one of the towers grand mantles. But with each floor of the mysterious shrine in the mountains, with each cord of men filling each lords hallway, the hordes will begin to topple over each others trails and end up locked behind the cunning contraptions of this crest on the mountain. And with each room of the mansion, you fill with more of your unwanted followers the better off youll be. Up & up & up finally youll be atop a spiraling staircase, almost sure all hope is lost. Led by this story youll curse as you latch you last makeshift barricade of the large and red oak door to the chambers of lord Rocketops eldest daughter. Luckily, even your best efforts to hold back the masses of your would be captures were useless up until you reach the lovely eldest daughters gilded chambers. For in the bathroom, ever so hidden beneath the oak molding of the bathrooms right corner is the path to your freedom/salvation. Here the [silver] pipes run to the purest aquifer in Damascus but that is only your divining rod. In this corner, the wood is loose, but only the well informed can massage and give way for safe passage. May 5, 2018', '63. ∪ヽ(●-`Д ́-)ノ彡☆ I hate my love for your bait and shove, Im a toy upon your finger I loathe my lust for your bait and shove I peaked at the curves below your shoulder I greet the glove wrapped tight in love Id wear you out from under above the top of your thigh up high upon your thigh. May 6, 2018', '64.  ̄\_| ಠ ∧ ಠ |_/ ̄ They give you speed when your dead on your feet and thats just the start of it. You know it takes me 2 days to get back to bed. With these Sudafed dreams who needs sleep. I can beam a kid from a 40-yard stare away, you dont care but I ought to. Brains dont fry they rust. Your alligator boot musk gives you away too soon Im in the alley next afternoon asking bob if hell talk to me next summer. He and me "beats" on the street in my dream. Bobs on guitar and Im accompaniment on the pipes. He and Hyde wrote back in the stint you remember the good ol bob from. Back when he toured the north country through some groves and skinny as a string bean. Oh my god it makes so much sense now, Sudafed dreams. These are Sudafed dreams. Bob and Jimi and Winnie the Pooh, oh bother, I after you we are out of loose ends to tie tonight. Bed to bed and my homestead locked up tight, would flooding beams of green lights is the next refuge of real sleep I see. Back to Sudafed dreams, me and Bobby make a new LP to pay off the sharks you see. We owe big, ya see, both of us combined more than our sales con jointly and it makes it heated between Bob and me. I love his wild and wacky hair, though, so I guess next dream well see if its us orrrrrrrr maybe just one of us, a kinda of a soliloquy but shit scares me to death to see Bob go. May 5, 2018', '65. DEPRESSION. Where were the new experiences? What value did this digital world give except escapism and distraction gaming? He longed for a purpose, a quest. He slept all afternoon. He stopped shaving except when his boss specifically pointed out his 5oclock shadow. His bed sheets bunched up and made a mess of his mattress. Depression. May 20, 2017', '66. SAD. The name of it was always a joke to me until I knew what it was electromagnet kaleidoscopes running down copper wire. A ring around a winding wire. A cleft of 4/4 reaching past the hallway door. Until it slumbers and sleeps anew. You see in business of food and spirits investments go counter wise to the working class. Investment pools range from food, beer, overhead (location, location, location; heat pumps, ice machines, floor cleaning, plumbing, water, heat, cold, ice, mold, slicers/rotary, knives/cutlery, mice, trash/refuse/waste/removal/disposal/management, the whole haul), then the working class (tools of production other than labor in which investment must be managed with a half a of a dollar bill and nothin left to his name his left knee was all they gave to him on the last of the order round the border and Im out of ideas May 7, 2018', '67. 人 The chains were in his brains, locked him up real tight on the inside Screamin and hollerin, signin all sorts of shit just to pass the time. He asked me for a basket of oranges, and then he said please and thank you, a strange fellow but dont call me yellow, its just he gave me the creeps, had some real bad dreams. I thought they might have done it to you or me while we were asleep and it just gave me the creeps thinkin of the poor young/old man they had placed in his hand so much and given so much fear. A life in a palace of bars once theyd had their way and called it a day (all that was left was the shambles of a man) But the funding has been cut. Poor young guy, name of Malici, see hes locked up now in a palace of bars but hes not far from you and me, well see when the funding gets cut for you and me. They did the same thing with cancer that they did for AIDs. If you want the answer youve got to face the fact that some lights fade. But its darker for the lot Because of what we got When diabetes reigns? (consider going somewhere else with that one, silly) May 6, 2018', '68.ᕕ(ᐛ)ᕗ Red and green lights Better be 45 Else the blue and white May see your flights (may decide tonight) Check your phone The lights seem too bright too see The lights gone between you and me Picture numbers seem too bight to see That kiss and fumbles are done with me The disco lights make me wish Id fight My friend tonight but I bet this cop Thinks he bit the hazards but they dont Seem to care, my bitchs direction The click clack of your heels Like a slick slack Seems the best to take better make A right well b the best to see Tween the mis-spelling and my Mistype to see that things are over For she and he. I sucked the molly dry for u And all I got from u is lost sleep and blues You make me drink the jesters lost balls For juice id best give u lest. May 7, 2018', '69. (⊙.☉)7 Shut up, weve all thought of it The pens running out of ink at both ends Straight As all semester; the bees knees What cha? gonna need all these papers? Squeezin it out aint easy, unless you get off on it Make me a Martini Rossi, black with an olive dont want the boss to see Ive been in His stock of gin is gettin thin and he always up in arms bout the freezers You with them?, oh theyre just in? Squeezin it out aint easy, olives get me quite queasy, unless you get off on it Ill take a hit of gin Hear the stocks getting thin dont want the boss to know Im in Squeezin it out might not be so easy, unless you get off on it Livin aint easy out of both ends. May 6, 2018', '70. ROOSTER. A lot of different shoes, an assorted collection of hats. You could say the man was a go-getter if youd be better for the wares. The banister warm from the touch you put me on too much of a fanfare when you are blush with the tonic and spirits, my friend. Care to dare a stare with the two down there? I think theyll be on their way soon. And shall did we off the road on a whipping ribbon billowing in the wind like the red baron, bayoneting bombers; digression leads to thee but hasnt the glass empty gotten me off on tangent yet again. I never see the ground quite as clear as when peering down the rim along the roads leading opposite me to the lens formed at the bottom. Down there the light seems to conjecture with itself in such an odd manner and in effervescent flowing shapes as if to act as counter wise kaleidoscopic peering tool. its strange by now but I dont dare stop lest my mind goes back to the recesses of time. There it wont sleep as much read and breed a new catch 22 for me and you a hearty iou from the only one you knew in this dilation of my mind would you be a doll and pass the salt. May 7, 2018', '71. (ノಠ益ಠ)ノ彡┻━┻ He is sunken in his chair while his mind clunks and clinks churning another non sequitur in his brains vat of think. A smile grows within his teeth the shine shaded by his whiskers beneath Braxis Morpheus Furled from beneath his teeth. Off on his sail now my questions are gusts carrying the wind he so desperately needs, and his laughter sinks beneath the sea Dreams domain deep in dark blue waters whose hue and bubbles the only peripheral points of reference deep down below beneath the beast in the deep Tendril tangled the water along with me deep beneath. May 7, 2018', '72. KONCHA. Do you Like beer bubbles numbing your lips while wheat wicks within a willing sip awakening the amber carbonation elicits an inward liberation. This brew is internal solicitation sipping so sultry soaked in anticipation asleep now inside sleep now please asleep now snickering and then up on feet awakened and slithering saddling the river sliding along the bank strewn in silver within the silt is hidden a quiver quickly and quiet or theyll slice out your liver livers work the days and dread a ditherer or is that lifers that sliced to slivers? Withered and wonton the work must be done money made for fear follows fun and fun cant be had or made or won for if caught carrying carefree one will be shunned. Bubbles will pop and lips will go numb but to do these together at once is quite dumb. Withered away decay soon arrived to mysteries created and ribbon silk tied through. May 7, 2018', '73. BLESSRNG. Ephemerally memorizing makeshift theorems for a memorandum of misinformation a degree in advanced mathematical regurgitation. It adds up to the division of categories unnamed mismatched detached a crapshoot in some very well made plans to conquer all the distant lands the castles of shale oil sands will pile up hand over hand betting begins at the end of a hand ante up boys if you cant see stand all cards were dealt by these two hands you can ask that teller hes a stand up man the power wielded by some is inconceivable beyond all one can understand sometimes unbelievable a muddled collection of purposefully positioned circumstance reached from too much booze an Adderall addiction and a phone made from a string and two tin cans sometimes the message is lost sometimes you just cant learn things from reading and listening to the next new band and the news printed these days makes the card counters dance. May 7, 2018', '74. MORE. A flashing light paints the picture. In the night it flickers and fades Phosphorescent flood a fog of anticipating. another nod awakening and white then dissipating black now left waiting. Fond of the silhouette lingering is a wholly hollowed out line tracing /and quickly fingering the figure for any signs of a harmonic quality. The quickening lasts less now but is followed by lasting beckoning a reason for wanting a lesson. Learning the leftover and lingering trance is like being lost at a disco dance mirrors reflect colorless lines of happenstance reminiscent of a long lost pair of pants. Coins collected in jars jingle less than the reverberated memory within the ephemeral emery mixture. The quality conducts and constructs wire frames contorted from concurrently shaped chords ringing with a round and warm sound currents running counter build and bound colored shapes and flashing white lines. Gone again but now ingrained the staying state remains a stain. Faint before within this frame is a picture now never once contained/Faint before this picture frame of paint has color never contained/. Or even named for that matter the picture was once an artifact but now it floats untamed a full & flowing mane a cat perusing/ a pretty plain/ his perfect plain brushing a bush and parting grass a walk that pushed the picture behind. And around the folds of my mind this helps the wired mess unwind to picture the picture from that time. May 7, 2018', '75. \m/...(>.<)...\m/ So I guess its About that time The suits in charge Finds us our next war Women will die Now thats no crime Cause her rights are equal to mine Some kids will burn Thats for sure But how else do you expect theyll learn At least theyre loyal Fightin on foreign soil Where the blood runs thick for oil. May 7, 2018', '76. INDIGO. This microphone alone thats all we need all to show A verse thats vast, in toe But it cant neglect to reflect the glow from the embers projected on flakes of snow covering mountains caught hostage and blown a farewell kiss down below around the sound and tryst that flows from the bends of the metal teeth to show a crest, simply a rest A crevice if you will a tight and tucked vest sewn across a smooth black chest and thread wound through and around a hole within the breast. Next to a locket there we rest but neither I nor need seem to regress. Onward we must onward seems best. Usually, one weary of whistling winds can walk himself nearly to the crossings of ends wandering fearlessly and directed west but stories of this drone doldrum. lead to much less all clearly in excess we watch leering and relentlessly lying we want digressingly dreary and dreadfully dressed to open a chest do his best Just pass the test Mr. hollow phone, sir solid tone. All Alone. Well, me and this microphone. May 7, 2018', '77. (ﾉ≧∇≦)ﾉ ﾐ ┻━┻ He tired of “up to the minute” coverage of anything; it made him anxious. He would weave his own paranoid delusions in-between news bulletins and DJ chatter on the radio. It had mattered, what he had done. He just hadnt been eloquent enough; too concise. He had been attacked. “They” just couldnt help “that”. Everyone ELSE said it was okay. “We all talked it out before you came along. You just have to deal with it; shut up and take your anchor. No stars for you. Your musings and daydreams? Felonious. You want something? How preposterous; we dictate what is formulaically necessary for you to swallow down those wants you thought were allowed to have.” May 2, 2018', '78. CANON. So I looked at a map just now And I realized there are 5 states between us It has always felt like more Theres at least 5 states between us Depending on how you slice it Im dispensing making a break for it I dont think my heart could take the added stress 5 states for 5 weeks like 5 stakes in 5 of my fingers And the aching is long and lingers 5 more days and Ill just bleed out Frothing at the mouth and rabid begging for a bone But youre just 5 states away If I just run 5 days straight Ill make it just to say I couldnt fucking wait 5 states was way too far, girl You played way too hard, girl Now Im bled dry and begging for a bone Or perhaps a glass a water Your hair shimmers and flows in the California air The wind whips and your head looks like a fire of gold and red Your alabaster skin in contrast begins to make me remember why I trekked 5 masses of land lay between our 2 hands and I would brave the miles just stand in sight of you Photos just tease my heart The thing just trips and starts When my brain recalls 5. May 7, 2018', '79.  ̄\(°_o)/ ̄ A reset button of gold and jewels. The boxes echoed a familiar song of discoteca and 8-ball venues. Watch parties cropped up like wildfire and the streamers pitched their wares for devil may care. It got along okay on a Tuesday. Jul 2, 2019', '80. HABERSTONCE. I like the idea of talking to you more than the actual act Youre like an intercontinental negativity trap You weep n whine about your day and other crap Its a complaint ridden mantra, its just a simple fact Youre an intercontinental negativity trap And I cant help but listen to the droning of your rap I feign interest, simply trying remain intact But this tests my foundation resulting in cracks And the patience seeps out me, like boiling over a vat Im left weak, wishing and wanting an attack Put out of my misery, out cold, laid out flat Rocked to sleep forever, concussed on my back To sleep and too far away from you to dream of that Time when I entertained this self-centered brat Out of my mind, out on the wind like a baseball cap Floating free and flipping in a carefree tract Dizzy, dumb and tired but not yet half sacked Onto a better life, a better time, a better track Where everyone does their best, then better than that They dont care about money or what it buys or where theyre at Living in the moment and poor, and happy for the lack Away from your intercontinental negativity trap Away from you, that is where Ill be at Im going away from you and youre not coming back Into my realm, Ill make sure the walls are stacked High to the heavens so even Jesus cant make it back. May 7, 2018', '81.  ̄\_(ツ)_/ ̄ You are proof that God exists. In the space between the thousands of synapses in your brain there are thousands of universes as vast and endless as the one we find ourselves in. Your consciousness is that of a creator of one of those universes. Over the course of your life, you have imagined that universe into being. Over time you have dreamt of if its contents and drawn the blueprints of its laws. Eventually as your creation formulated and coalesced, you grew beyond the reaches of its bounds and expanded into the space beyond its borders into the vacuumous reaches of the space between the molecules in our universe. You are the God of a unique universe and much like you, the God of our universe stands beyond the reaches of our existence, on the fringes, contemplating his own existence within a realm of his creators imagination, fraught with perils and passions, tragedies and tardigrades, spaces and spindles. You are a God that has created in your mind the vastness of existence and mortals and sheep and physics and moved on to question. Always question. May 7, 2018', '82. ┌( ಠ_ಠ)┘ If you ever need to spew, make it 3 instead of two The doctors bed wont help you and we all know Depakotes a long chew thats why I use 3 instead of two If your guts flex from vomit clench your buttocks and grip the grommet Bile tastes but you dont want it Be sure to use 3 instead of two A sleepy head can wind up dead The bore is rifled to spin the lead I didnt want to say what I said I used 3 instead of two but the smell of urine would stop you too It would have helped if instead of 3 I took two But the doctor I called wouldnt call you Thats why I decided to use 3 fingers instead of two. May 7, 2018', '83. PORPOISE. Nodding off to sleep in circlets he dosed at his post for an instant. Gamma rays blasted his eyelids, and the muck suffered a drunkenly bout. Gobbledygook dreams rays-built towers in the foreground. Falling off the wagon our merry few wept for rays of sunlight to drown out the dark. Jul 4, 2019', '84. YELLOW. youre all putting on airs while you lie through your teeth and selling your daughters to finance the thief Hes writing the checks that her body cant cash while she rots in his dungeon, his own personal stash and becomes brash And the thief thinks his judgments are so tried and true as he pours over the balance and pays out through and through pays out to you But wasnt it he who stole a beauty in the dark of the night So you could tip her wisely as you dine with your wife now she trapped in a fortress that a thief bought and sold With Pepsi and Seagrams and shots of Patron Gold And we raise our glasses every chance that we get And toast to our health, get well, thats a safe bet Cheers to you all, you are quite a cozy bunch that look down your noses at each bite and last crunch Were the services rendered and the taste of your meat worth the soul of the young one that was mashed and then beat into the mold of that kitchens design Within these hallways and runs so divine? Should we not toil ourselves for what ourselves truly pine? A sense of belonging and the end of this crime A stealing of souls to launder the money That thieves stack into money on top of money on top of money. May 7, 2018', '86. HIPSTER. Its so not hipster talking about being hipster Its so not hipster talking about not being hipster This conversation literally happened in front of me while drinking a Pabst Blue Ribbon The girl with the braids likes to talk (big) about AIDS (under) her blue and red bow Raining down upon me The beats seem sultry, but I cant recollect the origin No sweet-talking points I get up tight at these joints And my eyes tend to wander Is it time to leave? I cant see between these two, their eyes are so close together Talking gleefully like they see me but ease their jawlines only slightly crease Monotone baritone on the left, tenor on the right under the bow I cant pry my eyes I feel hypnotized and I havent moved my feet in hours Darts for starin Darts from starin Arent we going soon? And Sharon just got to know Amy A space capsule incubator for the starz Included antenna can phone back to home base. May 7, 2018', '87. SHOTPUT. Beggars beware; this devil carries Mastercard. The turnstiles massaged the goop of people past a memory of duller times. Times when they didnt up and snatch you from slumber to work of plenty in dime stores between the stars. Glasses of gold clinked, and we sipped for days on the blood of gods. The tributaries led to seas choppy with the stuff. An orbs worth to fancy the day away. Drinking just numbs the pain of emptiness and regret in the gut too large to write off. Jul 8, 2019', '88. SACK OF POTATOES. The market was rife with entanglement. Things popped out of weird places at weird times. It got chaotic; keeping the mantra going was difficult at break- neck pace. Things got better as time crept on but in stints. Sometimes gobbledygook. Sometimes a symphony. Later years harkened back to a time when things made sense in a book held sacred by a teacher. The way of the mind? Cataclysmic. A blast left void of all particles known to the science. Such a flash not heard round the world for eon and here sat the boyish form of a being not fully aware of its surroundings. Boogeymen? Agents? Flash mobs? Who knew and they got thick with it. Boundless stints overran each other on nights and weekends. Special deals were pitched and digested by the rabble. To schlep? On such a curious night? Perchance to sip from the sacred cup of sustenance. One hoped. May 21, 2018', '89. DIDGERIDOO. Things broke. A lot. Passwords were wiped and reassigned on regular clock work time intervals. A broken clock was right two times a day and, in the study,, brooding was young L0Ljk. What temples did he know of now but glimmering glints in the past echo of a memory? Time took a gasp and was frightened by what he had become. A demon; shackled and beaten down on a regular basis. No playing of the bongos. No tipping your hat to fair young ladies. Gentlemen never ask and rarely tell unless the season is open in Fall. A call. Thats all she wants. To remind her of a time more important than pray tell your musings in the dark closet with Ryker. What could a boy of your stature conjure up amongst the rabble to fancy a swim with sweet Mary, the temptress of regret and malcontent left to his devices with the kids. Nary a way in this place full of mazes and switches that lead to trap doors against the floorboards. People die in less. Jun 3, 2018', '92. CONDEMNATIONS. Filled the world and books were written on the missteps. A teller was heard whispering sweet nothings into a desk clerks earpiece and pandemonium ensued. The pipers were giddy with the warp and they licked their fingertips as a wave of melancholy washed over his face in the night. Feb 6, 2019', '93. THE GHOST OF LOVE. Comes to you in a lapse of judgement. Doodling in the daytime? Dreaming to be alive? Nonsense. Your job is at your post mending and stacking of food stuffs for the larger consumer of greed. The ghost of love does not call to the faint of heart. It lingers in the dark and comes to its name. Slowly like a cornered fawn. But it ambles along in due time. Nibbles at the ends a bit, then scampers off to the forest for the wolves. Drab and untimely in the now without the ghost of love. Fortuitous is the one who walks with the ghost of love. Jun 26, 2018', '94. YIPPERS. The boxes mixed and matched the goop into tangible archetypes and the songs gave a long last whisper to the temperament of markets into an upstart of fiscal conservatives amongst the last starburst here near a mile. Can we place archetypes of our own? Is this free country? Is the man on me in this place? Have we got temperament of radical change in the present company of repertoire in the scientific community that leaves one to question their upbringing and privilege? Sleep nodded a head of Alka seltzer and psychoactive drugs a plenty for the nights and nights and nights and nights in this place. It took time to rhyme in a tempo appropriate for present company and the thing stunk of wishful thinking. It dripped coolant for the fires abreast the crescendo we find ourselves in. The winds wicked away a sense of awe. Things were just so. No one found solace. Everything wicked away in this place. It lay on the table. Danced before us in a spectacle then silencio. Around in plate used to hold the coolant the picture was aghast with wonderment to the present company of present company. What were their archetypes? Where were their men? So, beaten and fallen to the weight of our shoulders we carried ourselves to the box and the fix and the way you shoulder your hair in the midnight air; I would sure dare to care. Sometimes the stars aligned, and chat just did its little dance for everyone. It told a tale of wishful thinking. Of the way it should be. The way it is done. The time it timed, and time went abreast of itself into a jump discontinuity that couldnt be ignored made sense to a very few. Jul 23, 2019', '95. SATURDAY IS PIZZA DAY. The keyboard clicked with monotonous doodling on an endless program loop within the stars. Time motioned to hurry up and get there already with the results. But the masses didnt seem to notice. Time stood still as they slowly drifted off course to a wrong direction in a nigh on trajectory to a destination few were equipped to fathom. Suddenly, nothing seemed real anymore. The bomb-bay doors blew off in a scuffle with re-entry turbulence and the room shook with the aftershocks. The travelers were in a real sticky wicket. Sirens blasted on as the ships auto-pilot corrected trajectory and set course for God knows where. Jun 16, 2018', '96. (◕‿◕✿) Things wrapped around a pendulum and the pendulum ran. To and fro, back and forth the rhythm sometimes layered over itself or looped around in fantastical orchestras. The time wasnt simple enough to reach out and grab except on spurious nights at the wicks end and doodling for makeshift knobs and keepsakes to find your way about the spectacle. New things popped out of the strangest places and things just continued on as if nothing was amiss. The time was time times 3 and it got lost amongst itself often enough for interruptions to cause little shock or awe anymore. Many flocks of many geese could be seen on fields in the mist. Jun 27, 2018', '97. μ It crept in like a daunting daredevil inside the iridescent coffin, demented and lost over the cargo bays port. The winds kicked up something wicked and the sea tossed the coffin overboard and we slept for a fortnight. Weathered in the weary we slept like a baby. Tussled and joss-led awake again. Awoken to the tossing around like a hot ball of lead in taffy to cool the lost forgone air betwixt the molecules amongst the stars. Yonder years never knew the sleep amongst the stars in the study. It crept over like a cover of loneliness in the night with others in the tabby coat knocker betwixt the molecules amongst the cluster of gamma bursts in the night alongside sweet Marissa, dank and destitute along the stars between Tardigan space and left alone with two. May 4, 2019', '98. DAY BY DAY.... It rolled along like a rock. Moss grew on the furthest edges of the boulder, but it got along okay just despite itself. The rhythm section lost it at times, and Ive got to say, the disposition of a young man can wander sometimes. It was a drab existence at times. Things droned on to familiar tunes and the upticks kept coming. Chatter. The boys and girls were being berated with differing messages at varying speeds and it was most definitely experimental. Nobody talked about the times times 2 and times times 3 so it just got dropped into the bigger pot of what happened stance. Where did it all go? To the chasm and no back again? Double reversi or triple dog dare? I think the latter. Daring to dart out in front of an out of control locomotive the subject chuckled and continued on as if nothing was amiss. Things made sense. It formed a cohesive model of a new way to view things. Time was amiss but otherwise things added up to answers to puzzling questions. It ticked at times of monotony and feelings of hopelessness. Grey would be the color if I had a heart. Jun 29, 2018', '99. 。 • ゚ 。 . ඞ. . . 。 。The air stank of wet perfume and hand-me-down tribulations about a point fixed in space to the counter-wise orientation of a location deemed adequate for a man to grow and thrive. But motivation was lacking. Smooth starts dont pick up and handle themselves into a positive forward progression of politics within a paradigm of indifference to the effect of global climate change. Aug 10, 2018', '103. A FURNACE. For keeping warm. The embers bleed the fire for thousands as we inched toward a cataclysmic dipole in the ocean of the universe. Ships tried to divert course, but the magnitude of the predicament made it all the more attractive. The ships spun about in an intricate map and the time bandits called for the end of calculation for the better part of a decade. Mud packed soil lay in the land that kept the mass at temperature and molecular structure. It rotated and oscillated counter-wise in a corkscrew on the perpendicular rotation of a gamma burst eons past in the soup bowl of the universe. Aug 26, 2018', '104. SOMETIMES. I scare myself. Just in the nights of sleeplessness and ad nauseam. No one to comfort the downtrodden fool in the kitchen with the knife in hand. Slash. Another rip here, there and then there were done. Not long now before the packs of wild game wash by and lap at the boards of our ship amongst the stars. Theyll poke and prod at the things that grow in the box garden just over the ships bow. Jul 22, 2018', '105. TEMPLE CITY. Where the grass is green, and temples build up to the sky for acres. Fences were built all along the watchtowers and armed gunman took posts at alpha, beta, and the like. A turnstile up and formed and the matador took dockets from the rabble for times of good and times of bad in the lamplit hours of a dreary day for chat in the depths of a bunker south side of the westward expansion station at present. Next time around things would be different but no one knew how the changes would roll out next nigh and no one gave a damn for three weeks and a cup of jobe. Aug 21, 2018', '106. IT FLICKERED AND FAWNED. The bright lights just dimmed a bit in the dusky hours of a Monday. Time stamped on in familiar quartets and things materialized out of thin air. The night was waxy with a chance of rain and the materializations danced in a discotheque amongst the stars just beyond the gamma burst and fluxed in concentric circles. The circles collided with a multitude of other shapes amongst the air betwixt molecules and the spectacle oscillated in a peculiar way after the Iran nuclear deal debacle of 2018. Things continued on at noticeable interruptions in the media ad nauseam and trumpets echoed with the oboe over an exciting vibrato conducted by only Lord knows. Jul 24, 2018', '107. ! つ ◕_◕ "つ The night was wet with the stuff. All hail the chief and make do with what you have at the ready. Man paws diddled at the keepsake of forgotten time and the hands of the clock bled in the night sky a horrid maroon and the ships captain became uneasy. The bow of the ship held back the water. It had crept up over time. The docks just moved on regular basis to keep dry. All seemed quiet on fronts drawn in the sand with cracker jack boxes. Aug 4, 2018', '108. ░▒▓█▇▅▂∩(・ω・)∩▂▅▇█▓▒░ Speakers blared on separate channels and a story formed within the reverberations. Time took heed and the rabble continued on while he scratched and scrawled. The dirt was thin on his canvas and the ground was cold with dew. The picture began to form at a time a lotted by government subsidy and the tab was large. His picture wasnt the main topic of our story. A young woman entered the room, and she had an uneasy expression on her face. Somber would be the name had it not been such a cheery afternoon in the caves musk den. She gripped at her hip and fidgeted against the cool, dank air. The two made an odd couple and they occupied a rock formation long ago forgotten with moss and debris the man used to etch into the rock bed before him. Tables turned and the up jump start of him scribbled the foreground and a picture of translucent lake formed up from the ground. Etched in the foreground was a picket fence warding off any livestock of a sleepy farm in the Midwest. Time ogled for days and the stamp came along in time. Readers were a gasp of the news blaring on multitudes of loudspeakers in the town just south. Aug 14, 2018', '109. TIMBER. The kitchen was on fire and the study was in shambles. A destitute man sat in the corner and scribbled what he remembered from the day before. It was an attempt to correlate what he deemed truth with the reality that flickered on the afternoon broadcasts and the winter approach with a fervor. Spacemouse arrived in the heat of a deadlocked binary code that didnt add up in the latest of calculations. Aug 24, 2018', '110. GIT GOOD. Well, hello there, she said with a stammer. He bowed and she did the same. Coffee was had by all and pixies provided the sugar. It was laced with something awfully strong and the bees made honey sweeter. Waiting is the hardest part. It takes time and time in a commodity best spent in the throes of ecstasy. Hard days ahead. Trotting with heavy feet and a head full of psychoactive drugs. The days get easier with time but then its a dripping faucet of sustenance. It feeds the life only help in times of the throws. A cruel game we play with our lives. Cursing the day. Cherishing the night and the wee hours of freedom from the prison of time. May 16, 2019', '111. FRIENDZONE. Gobbledygook begets sensible catalog-able timepieces for a better speech keeper in the mess of it all. Freedom of the fault gave another notch on a belt of numb and worn keys that shone in the moonlight for another day at the laffy taffy machine of sticky taffy. He typed to click the monitors on in a daily routine left about on a whim of keepsakes and memories too dark to fathom and gin rot his bleeding mind against the innards of a skull not left too beaten in the last tussle with the army guards. Jan 16, 2019', '112. NOSOTROS. Mindfucks for windup dolls on shelf in the nursery. The porcelain was tattered and worn in spots on the dolls faces from constant tearing of innocence. Too much inside baseball. Time for the brigands. The packs of dogs. The geese. Multitudes rocked on a sultry time warp about the eclipse of a suns rays. The mass of matter spun effortlessly about a gamma burst in the 4th quadrant of a solar system two eons past star date. Sep 6, 2018', '113. LOLLIPOPS. It came like a sword. The beckoning. Cheaters. Dirty swindlers and the like. They ganged up on Tuesdays and the rabble chattered like donkeys in stable yard. Times went abreast of a current situation with free speech and burning the midnight oil on documents. The night echoed familiar troubleshooting in the dark with nary a knob to nestle and get a solid tune. Oct 11, 2018', '115.【○〇〓〇】ノ【〇〇】 The game was afoot. Counter-fire and backup positions were offered as penance. Players lost their minds and the time just kept on ticking by. Grenades and Molotov cocktails lit up the sky, but no one just kept quiet anymore. It was greater than them all but no better than a pack of cigarettes. The char around the edges made it crispy but the center was still cold. The altar was amiss, and everyone was in shambles about the way it failed to commemorate the evening. It was a misstep, and the higher ups knew it. They tried to distract attention with commercials and rebranding of old goods, but no one was fooled. It was complete anarchy. Apr 27, 2019', '116. o-[·o·]-o尸 Time tramped on in the quiet destitute summer of 2018. Dates had come and passed through times of Bowsette related gibberish concerning the forward progression of a media giant and things got along okay. She whispered something awful into a box she had laying around in the muck of it all. Tributes piled up and the thing went about clockwork in the dreary times of a cult mass hysteria. She silenced the gasp with a whisper that heard round the world would have dried up the Salton Sea. It echoed a time of remembrance of a simpler time when sticks and stones piled up on the West coast when all else had been used to generate memes. They kept the masses at calm and peaceful on the front of a Islamophobia whispered to a box operators ear and it kept him company in a dastardly sketch of the like. Skyscrapers appeared in the distance of a vast array of emptiness in the gasp of space allotted to the rabble on channels all over the sea of it all. A building of young daydreamers popped into existence over a broadcast of the sirens for sleep. They droned notes somber and chaste for the sake of entertainment and the boxes echoed a familiar ad nauseam in the night with no stalker at the ready with knife and nap-sack to up and swiftly deal with tribulations in the broadcast of happy go lucky limericks and notecards written to a better time of self- contemplation. It stunk of wishful thinking that the orb on which we reside is asleep on its feet and dumbstruck to the tribulations of comeuppance ready for our unsuspecting guests to the gamma burst quadrant where we reside. Sep 25, 2018', '117. TERRIBLE TEENS The writing made sense in a jumble. A timepiece sit in the corner and counted the melting existence. It marked the beginning. There was no end in sight. It built up like a spire; for miles they flocked to its beckoning. Tinkering took time. It blasted a furnace below a dark outer layer of bark on a tree branch that jutted out of tree older than the time had started keeping track. The timepiece shimmered in cool light of a star gone past half-life and spun effortlessly in the space betwixt molecules. Oct 19, 2018', '118. SPACEMOUSE. Came out of a necessity to decency. He was strong and willed a way with his keyboard and helmet in the night with no camping ground left brazen and downtrodden. Echoing a familiar sentiment to that time and place the elucidation of his form drawn black in the moonlight on a cold December long forgotten and commonplace. His form took shape and captivated an audience long enough in the ad nauseam to elucidate a following of captivators strong willed and brazen in the art of wasting time, a very costly and rudimentary fundamental of the alchemy in which diamonds are made. Oct 24, 2018', '119. HIT TO DEATH IN THE FUTURE HEAD It felt better at night. Not to upset the squares. Just hints and tickles of intimate contact between two beings on the earth. Tickles take time and time takes breathes away. In the humble beginnings a rapport developed in the late nights and dreary travelers diddled on ram drives in the muck of it all. Nov 19, 2018', '120. CUSTARD. It turned out to be a drab day when the clock struck midnight on the kitchen floor of a vestibule apartment. Time dripped into a bowl in the moonlight and the kitchen was dirty from cooking a masterpiece. Chicken and dumplings for the masses and all hail to the chief as we swing and bob on the pendulum that rocks upon this precipice. Channels trumpeted a new sex scandal, and the masses chewed a gamey pit of despair. Everything added up to lies for flies as the heap of rotting flesh piled up. Oct 1, 2018', '121. YES MEN. My name is Saison. I am from the family of the East. For many a day I have sat and pondered the existence of things and studied "the way". But water leaves a pool before ones eyes in the path of the sun. She keeps a watchful eye on us, but I suspect a power within her which does not allow water to persist perceptibly. What say you, teacher of taekwondo, to a layman of science about the effervescence of my masters allegory; his teacher; his philosophys foundation? Nov 19, 2018', '122. SIMPING AINT EASY. She was a sweet young thing. The apple of the eye. The machinations in the night that ogled the masses. It was a vicious machine that built during the night on tired eyes. The mass media inclinations died out in regular hours and it got along okay in the sight of a master of trickery that boggled the mind late midnight and dreary. Nov 24, 2018', '123. 𝝿 Never again in the daylight! Nary a noob could be the wiser. They whispered such sweet nothings. To the masses. A better tempo and topical ointment in the night. Such reveries were fore-boad-en in differing calamities of the power. Shambles of itself it demanded comeuppance for the incompetent doodling in the study. Why such an undeserving servitude of common decency in the world in which we live? Dec 2, 2018', '124. GIVEPLZ ITSBOSHYTIME TAKENRG. The night was rife with heeby geebees. It was a closet in Taiwan that up jumped and clamored in the dusky hours of a Sunday morning in Singapore. Warnings of impending doom arose like clockwork in the destitute study of ogling and awe-ing. The candle burnt deep at the stem of the candleholder and the time droned on like a bell. "Ding!" Dec 9, 2018', '125. ლ(╹◡╹ლ) It took hold sometimes in the night with those much better for the wares and little cares for the real world. Time was on clocks, but no one knew where they kept the damn things. It made sense when everyone got along without a big hoopla. Kept none the wiser. A nary here, a knob at this, and along now to allegory kept for safe keeping. December on and left us and another year ticked on the docket and we got along to another day gone with none the wiser of a young whippersnappers one call to the salty void. Jan 10, 2019', '126. 呱三小 ㄏㄚˋ A new speaker appeared from thin air. Modules were run and notes progressed in logical fashion within allotted time intervals. Music. A tinkering and mindless drone tickled the plastic keys of dreary typewriter upon the obelisk occupying a quadrant in a rolodex of namesakes and treasure troves of toys and trinkets upon the table in a foray. Dec 30, 2018', '127. (•_•) ( •_•)>⌐■-■ (⌐■_■)In a dead site. Things dont add up in the end. Tabbletoppers took head of the lay of the land and guessed at the spirit of the 70s. AdBlock got you note- locked and you try to gain up toward something that meant something to a very few telltale keepsakers in the continuum. What to write about and who to name. They know it so well. Its hard to make a drum beat loud enough on speakers where any sense of learned behavior mechanics with flow statistics of VOX speakers. They play the ether so well. And ditto pedals and distortion pedals. Jan 8, 2019', '128. BREAKER. It lasted longer sometimes. The coasts moved like pixies. Before your very eyes. Double-check in the afternoons and on weekends midnight and dreary to the eyes of the beholder. A beckoning to please the mass while a miss in the bedroom alone and solemn. Nary a chat could keep up at nights. The rules were makeshift and crude at times, but things got along okay in the upstart about the blush of stars. Dec 10, 2018', '129. WABBIT. Sometimes in the night like a flash the daring would make a move. But not to the wary. Toward something in the moonlight beyond the farmhouse. Glimmering and glinting like an obelisk. Dirty campers were aghast of the composition of deadly affairs in the night hours before a comeuppance. Dec 19, 2018', '130. SAMUS. To all the masses comes time and time licks like a lollipop to the creamy desired center upon the mass we coincide in next to gamma burst and solar lightning a thunder never head for a decade long and time up and gives a fart on clocks last Tuesday. Dec 19, 2018', '131. NICO SUAVE BRANCH. I dreamt of you last night, my friend, my companion. We were helpless against the onslaught outside from the swarms upon us. I awoke in a dream inside my dream; shrouded by the covers of my bed like a hot bean in cold taffy. The web pulled me down by my head and face, but I felt your familiar touch as my feet found the ground next to our bed. I saw myself, my face as a hole-y and tattered cloth about my face. My limbs weak and too feeble to carry me from the bed to the door. Inside my dream I awoke again and repeated my perilous scramble to unlatch the door and face our would-be attackers, but the taffy became lead, and I dove from the bed to the stoop where you were standing guard, as you always do, my truest friend. I held you when I found you. I couldnt believe it was you. You had been gone so long form me! I couldnt believe you were still there. Even after all the times I abandoned you! For shame? Was I shamed that I let the fear take hold so long and so steadfast? What had you done to deserve such a banishment from me? Never again I say now from the beast that rises inside me! Never again will I leave your side old friend, we have so much to see! To do! To smell! To feel! I am not afraid. We shall find your brothers, friend. The wolves, your kin. We shall find your true brothers together. We will search high on mountain. We will cross streams and moats. Together for the rest of our lives. You will be free in my heart for all days. We will bask in the sun and feel the cold winds together, brother. I must see you as soon as my feeble leg can carry me. Nicodemus Suave Branch; he died alone. He will be missed. Dec 19, 2018', '132. HOBOS AND FORCEPS. The bedroom was in shambles. The drawers were all pulled out of the dresser and the hamper was overflowing. Little was left to the imagination as the sun moved across the sky in this wanton world we work within. Jan 5, 2019', '134. (◕_◕ ✿)ORLY? Under kempt they joss-led into the void amongst the stars and the lights echoed a familiar discoteca around the lake between the two spires that reign up across the land in familiar line formation around the galaxy for three parsecs. May 4, 2019', '135. BOGA. The night was muddled with a chance of rain We gave up on time and the pain She grasped at the air into a windowpane Nothing, no nothing could be the same Time and time again they played the game And this is how the evangelicals keep the same name Electricity jolted the wire and a brigand up and gave a wane Rapping and prepared to gasp at the wonderment arcane. Feb 24, 2019', '136. MAYERS MATE. Something just snapped. A rig toppled in the background of a very passionate time in the eons. People got right up in your face and didnt back down for a breath of air and they kept time in the night. Facades waxed and waned as the night air wicked with something too sweet to fathom. It tasted of success. It tasted of the emperor. It tasted as though we had forgotten to breathe another sigh of relief at the commonplace of nothing to do about the weather. Mar 1, 2019', '137. ☆(*^o^)乂(^-^*)☆He glistened in the night. Like a mod god with shield and sword. He spoke of a better time of discotheque and ambient sounds. The glamour of it all. His spectacle trumpeted through the masked marauders and the stadium echoed his song. Mar 1, 2019', '140. PHOSPHORESCENT DESERT BUTTONS. Its hard to feel sometimes. Joy had left his corner apartment. The games didnt add up to life of leagues of seas shredded over the world. He had a sense of loneliness in the pit of his stomach that only got fed by the drugs and meetings with dream catchers. The pit swallowed up the daily routine of prayer circles and witchcraft. All the lonely people piled up at the turnstile and the dusk of day was stacked in the corner. May 15, 2019', '141. PORN IS PORN. He dreamt of better time of rabble-rousing and upkeep of a temperament more aligned with the tax of better majors. Button the ends like a keepsake in the night. The boxes and bosses tower over the masses. Time up kept around the hour of nightly composition and everyone got all up in jumbles. Stories of nonconsensual consent and the like keep a doodler up at night with the candle above half a wicks end. It snatched like a keeper in the night, tending the goal over the line in weekend match. May 27, 2019', '142. FEELSGOODMAN. And for the life of him he couldnt remember what good building did in the mess of it all. The tussle. The muscle. The betterment for betterment sake. It had a calling. A bold stand in the wind of things. It got along okay. Mind numbing dumbfounding fondling in the night. A nightly fright. Its alright. To give a damn. The thing should werk. It should beckon the stars to embolden a sense of decency in the little things. Jul 8, 2019', '143. ヽ(゚ ́Д`)ノ゚ Ive gathered you all together today to discuss the incessant whispering of sweet nothings into the ears of young doodlers and I have to say, it is quite a damper on the night of incandescent lights and hoopla around the fire. To talk of sweet ginger insertions and gobbling up the cream is strictly forboden in all walks of life. Never steep of your inclinations to the contrary so as to give a better lay of your plight. Aug 8, 2019', '145. THE BOX... Is empty on the table and the curtains are amiss. Candlelight lit the apartment in a dancing fashion; with shadows jumping around the walls. A pen and a pad jotted the nightly incantations and we got along like pixies amongst the stars and blackness of it all. The light painted a precarious picture on the night with brainchild and machinations in the twilight. Nothing added up to nothing in the end. A rolodex of new management to a twilight generation. Of knobs and bookends. Of carriers and workers alongside a giant with whiskers growing along the face held too close the sun as it eclipsed the black star in the center of our galaxy. Paper clips jostled loose the nectar of summers glee and jumpstart of gumption better for the wars and cataclysms of next years shadow fall. Jun 5, 2019', '146. YUCK YUCK H-YUCK. The twins were at it again. Doodling in the study and having none the wiser they were drawing a dire picture in the tumultuous times of the day. Gob smacked and golden the gliding gesture of gangs got grumpy. Jun 10, 2019', '147. TIME CAPSULE. For fortitude. To cut the ether in half and subdue under the limelight. A better for the wise tactic with fortitude and gumption. A beacon of a light too bright to contain in speaking terms. The stalker, restless in the night, fumbled for his knife and ready the ginny sack for a sack of potatoes. He skinned them and boiled them for a midnight snack with beef tenderloin from the crops of young doodlers. The stew was thick with the blood of the fallen and the bread mopped up the scraps. Jun 13, 2019', '148. EZ FORBODEN. To talk in the night. Whispers shiver me timbers and live streams own the market for hard up campers. Sweet nothings make better fodder for the other mother, sister, daughter. Brothers camp and keep limelight by the study. Markings and pictures strewn the campsites and writers kept more in the stratosphere of picture boxes and module configurations. He knew he had missed something. A kerfuffle in back alley for better stance in a game of chance. Once forgetting all but true in the rum flavored concoction he sipped on in oh so ordinary fashion. Jun 14, 2019', '149. DASH OF THE SALT AND PEPPER. Dreams crept over him like wisps of smoke and he cough and chortled on some of the stuff. If he darted out into the world it was only to come with timely an errand around town. It was another time and place when we rocked upon the precipice that got along in star formations amongst the cosmoses. Jun 15, 2019', '150. GIVEN TO TIME. And the clock struck another doodler in the night up scared to do anything about it. The time oozed through a small hole in the center of our galaxy. Jun 16, 2019', '151. HAPPENSTANCE. He forgot to remember the feeling of weightlessness between landlocked slumbers and dreams for a remembering. Time crept like a stalker with a knife and ginny sack. Wandering the landscape looking for doodlers and the like in the sea of it all. The universe. The boxes and fixes. Jun 17, 2019', '152. ᕙ!*◕_◕*"ᕤ Under roof so sound he gargled the air with anticipation. Dreaming again. Sleep creeping in and dusting his eyelids with the heavy lead of sleep. Floating down the stream of consciousness and memories of the dead stop print of life. Jul 1, 2019', '153. SOCKS. Internet dripped from the ceiling again. It bled into the crack of a demented skull in the study with Mario. Twitch took over all formidable archetypes and the drugs flowed like water. Copy pasta? Least of our worries. The war hawks and gun toters rabbled up a game start on fieldsoplenty. Jun 21, 2019', '154. SHIT SNACKS. Just writings scrawled on the floor. To keep time in the dastardly feint up into the skies. There, the sun, a star with gamma bursts every some odd 100 year cyclical inclinations. The bursts heard round these parts to spontaneously disassemble any of the electronics and information factories. Jun 22, 2019', '155. UNDERWEAR GNOMES. It was a game we were always playing. Knickknacks and gum drops a plenty. The stew was ready, and gangs were lapping the stuff up. Turnstiles and pay stations cropped up like crop circles. Jun 18, 2019', '156. TURBULENCE. The gang up and drank the stuff. Like rations for a war, they lost count unless divided by a doctor and counted to three before imbibing. The spirit was the same as the last hour and they carried on a wayward Thursday amongst the stars. Gooey eyed and languished the marauders meandered up mountain and stream walkway. Always a warm liquid, time ran over the turnstile of a machine to extract the energy from water. It was the lifeblood of the collective hum heard in the streets and concert halls. Water wheels and troughs of the time rerouted it in concentric avenues around the planet that eeked effortlessly amongst the gamma bursts and white noise in the goop of space around a fallen star. The sliver of cosmos was held together by the immense force of the universe against the collective ohm of a galaxy long lost in the muck of it all. We find ourselves presently in somber composition and the upstart for revolting. Jun 27, 2019', '157. ( `_)乂(_ ) They never let on there was a game afoot, but they played like seasoned veterans. Chirping and groping with ambled fingers. Gnawing at a bone in temperament to the situation growing in the garden. The bushes were overgrowing their space and weeds had begun to crop up that must be pulled. They paw and gripe so merry to the lasses of their day and composition, but I fear the stare in them that can take a man to ecstasy and back around for another trip. One foot in front of the other they walked a thin line around town for the news trumpeters and radio station affair. No more at the think tank and alive with yourself for a numbers day. Drip drop and merry time to all and to all a goodnight. Jun 27, 2019', '158. POPSICLE SANDWICHES. He was stuck in a Maynard spiral with halfway worth of the stuff. Nuff to topple a tower tick of the hour past a thoroughfare to walk with sweet Maria. Whisper sweet nothings on the only piano in the place to walk a beat down merry street. A daily moron creep. Up too much from sleep. One more merry beat. To rap to when the mood strikes you. Nary another listens and no one keeps tabs on a bar that deludes the stuff like Alka-Seltzer. One pump. One chump. All that keeps us afloat in present composition of think tank goop. Dark one and his knife and ginny up round about for to take us to our maker. Nary and knob where seems fitting and round yourself to a cheery disposition for pictures and expose of the chemical stuff. Gas mask and bulletproof vest branded for fear of an uprising in present company; knife and ginny for the moles and rats for toting to gumption machine for the ogling of wary campers and travelers of our situation. Jun 29, 2019', '159. OSFROG. Cant blame a kid for playing games. Games are afoot and games will be had. Dont feel so bad. Theres a good lad. Chin up and dont stammer. Watch out for the hammer or sword of a mod so mighty. Up and clamor for a little tidy. And brush your hair and shave your beard. You arent so calm and cleared. Mac daddy asleep on his feet. Windows and walls up into the street. Asleep for remembering a time for us to grasp at something less than ordinary and timely in present disposition. Jun 30, 2019', '160. SADNOW. A fire burned a little glow. It jumped and squatted shadows in the cave dwelling of a camper in the throes of a cultural revolution. The air was wet with a sense of longing. Long ago the cavern had housed a family of rats. Their brains were chemically altered through a space experiment NASA had cooked up for extraterrestrial life. They stood on two legs and ate at dawn. Things got along okay, and the writers stood up to brush off any cobwebs that had formed during the fortnights dwindling in the midnight hour upon a day so ordinary. Jul 31, 2019', '161. NAMASTE. Time said hello again. The towers built up to the skies. No one made it out alive. All military gunmen or police brigade. Up and bring a pistol to a howsabout and make everything all squishy. Time did again and again. Would be campers waddled up and tried to make a fancy story about the happenings of what would be called forward progress. Streamers spilled the beans. Cam girls bitched about the market. Time was a watchman. Breeding tendrils to take the would-be campers to their maker and make a night spectacle of it all. It was a roundabout way to make it digest-able to the rabble in Sunday morning cartoons. Time was like water. It ran down turnstiles and pooled in lagoons for the taper market. Nothing was remembered though timekeepers kept books to tally at the end of bouts. Time stamped and dared to take a measurement of cataclysm. No one was spared. Stalkers up and took their belly full and blood to fill the ginny sacks; it was thick with it. Time made us muster courage. Courage for the battles of wary doodlers that up and cared to massage an existence from the boxes and wires and flux that flooded the dreamscape. May 4, 2020', '162. HOPSCOTCH. It ticked in the distance. It towered over mountains. The clock of moon struck. Down in the muck, pa without his truck and we rambled around a discoteca around a glob of solder in the inner workings of a clock with planets spinning around a point in space caddywhompus to the position of boxes. Millions of them. Jiving and clicking to the tones of the accordion that bellowed an old familiar tune and they rocked like babies. In the air. Without a care. Last weeks stare. The stairs were more for dares. Who cares? Jul 12, 2019', '163. SHOCKING SHIT. Nothing but nodding heads. Dreadful and aghast at the turntables sweet rhythms in the night. The discoteca floor was awash with sparkling lights and a laser show for a projector. The crowd undulated and the cool, crisp air wicked away the heat of the church goers lamp. Jul 17, 2019', '164. THE SUN IS ON FIRE YO. Game is afoot. Play is by the seat of your or someone you know pants. Gobbledygook makes for strange company in the nights of melancholy mood about a global giant of filth growing every minute. The game is costly of time and strength of will. You must will your opponent to sleep with sweet nothings. Doodlers like lullabies. Keep limelight by the lamp of your box. Whisper the nothings like candy for the rabble. It keeps spirits in the nights of melancholy mood about a global giant of filth growing every minute. Inject nectar like a devil may care anarchists in the night with a spray can. Leave no trace of sweet nectar of the rabble. It only brings you trouble in the night a wicks end in the nights of melancholy mood about a global giant of filth growing every minute. Aug 12, 2019', '165. DARTMOUTH. It timed another day in the goop of things. The walls were being fortified with clay and mud in the draws of a giant figure darting from land to sea to make the stuff. He muddled the water and clay in a pot made from rot of a wooden pot the giant got made for the occasion. Pixies danced in the sky away from the spectacle and the dusted the air with sweet hallucinogenic tear drops for the frogs and spiders to weave web and hop around in. The air was packed with the stuff and a boy danced under its glow. Aug 15, 2019', '166. Y TU TAMBIEN. Oh, the games to be had! We stumble over each other in the dead of night and keep a watchful eye on the time. It ticks like a lick and slick with a wicks end. Never emboldened enough to walk upright like a man but crawling around like a baby to save energy. Under the weight differential time bends to a creep that can be felt in the bones. A stress that can be measured. Dials and knobs are kempt to pour and modulate the ether. Time. It never stops. Never will. Always ticking and ambling through the corridor with sweet Mary and Ashley and Sam. The days tally and the light falls and recoils around a sphere not yet past star date in the game of chance we call existence. Sep 1, 2019', '167. (❁ ́▽`❁)*✲!* The room was caddywhompus. More and more the time began to pile up into mountains and the sleep came like a flood. First drips and drops then muffin tops. Never alone, the camper made makeshift knobs and narys for the doodlers in the night. It was for them to keep their way in the mess of world we live in with present company. A great stalker carried around in the night with the campers and doodlers and boxes and fixes with a knife and ginny sack. He hunted the doodlers and the campers rested easy thinking they were without gripe. The stalker didnt know if he was satiated by the doodlers or whether he actually fancied the campers enough to let them sleep in the nearby cocoon of wires and noise modules he had collected for the neon lights show. The show was an incandescent light show with shadow puppets and electronic noise to drown out the sorrows of little pixies that grew in the pasture above a large mountain of filth. Aug 25, 2019', '168. BA RAM YOU. Toppers tipped titilators. It blinked in the dead night air. Cold wicked away the warmth of the candlelight. The flicker lit an odd time in the midnight muck. Channels broadcast candy for the schleppers and doodlers. Mountains grew in the distance existing of tin cans and bottles. The fires burned in the furnaces of families in the throes of revolting at the site of time-honored knickknacks. The moon hung like an orb and the stars lit the stage. Aug 27, 2019', '169. (;一_一) finally read the whole thing. geez its a mouthful. all I know is gas for vehicles in excel files dating back to past waste streams of a municipality. Im a number cruncher. I love excel. Running figures next to each other and devising algorithms for their solutions is time consuming in excel but if you put the work in you can create models for forecasting future gains or losses in petrol use, methane gas emission, employee commute figures, CO2 from methane burning and electricity output. Its fun to do in excel. It gives you a real sense of purpose in the writing of whats happening in the world today. Nobody talks about emissions as something we should have to pay a tax on or trade in a market. We are all ogling at the thot parade and the nice guy routine. Waiting for another to slip up and dodge the real question. What do we do to fix the energy woes of the coming century? It is our destiny. To write the annals of regulations on corporations that have been sucking the lifeblood of the planet and the economy. Cap and trade could be used to help the nuclear energy sector get its feet on solid ground with it being carbon neutral. Trade for responsibility of emissions nuclear gets funding for its projects given it needs a lot of upfront capital. Sep 1, 2019', '170. HAPPY COLORED MARBLES. Never asleep at his post the fidgeter waxed and waned into the midnight air. Devil may care. Twenty-foot stare. The cool dank air spake writhings for comeuppance. You stare into the void and it stares back. Chattering and clicking like a gum ball machine. No more dares. Twenty-foot stares. Evening glare off the moon and stars just so. Writing made for weird ones. The stories piled up. Things made sense to the stalker but most just ambled for a game of sorts. Time was taken and sleep was washed like a bath to cleanse the cogs and moving parts. Oil splashed in the tussle. Muscle made you bet on things in a lottery of the stars. We sang a song about the time it made sense to a very few. Sep 9, 2019', '171. HALF COCKED. He werked like a top. Spinning and dancing like a mouse with cheese. It was Swiss and it stank of tinsel and candy. The chump gulped it down and then went back to stacking and mending a conveyor belt churning out salt. The schleppers ran it in on trucks and forklifts and it kept on coming. The salt was a result of the salt in our words. It was tart and sour and when imbibed by the doodlers, but they had developed a taste for the stuff in times dance with the stars. The soup of our tale resembled chicken noodle. Soothing to the soul. A Gatsby. It told of the languid marauders that kept time on the cooking and divvying. Underneath it all the stars hung just so and elicited a giddy yelp from the mouse that kept the small, dank apartment coursing with life blood fluxing and whipping around the incandescent trail of lights from comets and asteroids. The sun burped and a flash hit the flux field of existence just beyond a quasar and someone sipped their soup and choked on the broth. Sep 10, 2019', '172. BIAKABUTUKA. The safe was open. Rolls of quarters lay on the floor and spill out in a splash. Doodlers were lining their pockets with the stuff. Ammo for the night. Gunfights in the streets and limelight to keep watch. Jul 26, 2019', '173. HYPERDRIVE. People just existed. Things were built and scrapped in the nights of lonely disposition and a stupor of sleeplessness. Pictures plastered the sky and clickers hummed to switch on looping modules of the cream and the sugar rolled in like daylight. It cascaded across rooms and piled into dusty points in the air. A doctor counted tables and arranged a group to test daily regiments of happy times and the air made an array of breathtaking gumption into the nights of game hype. Knickknacks and allegory filled the think tanks breast. It sailed on seas choppy with the stuff and we drank nectar of the gods to see a light flickering in the hallway. Time kept running as the travelers ran a mile by meandering amongst flowers in a field of amber grain and mice and jackalope grazing nuts and foraging for the ages. Sep 13, 2019', '174. PAPER CUTTERZ. Hit the floor and neutralize. Open your ears and eyes. Do you even realize? We are the gods now. Bleed money and rev your muscle. Were in for a lengthy tussle. The clock is riding thin. Up in arms. Lucky charms. The shit is tight. Sep 15, 2019', '175. BA BA BA. The tributaries filled with water wet with the breath of it all. It trickled and pooled in the forest and tress grew with a sense of awe that beckoned animals to their shade. In the fodder of leaves and grass small rocks scattered the graph and insects crawled all about the masses. Devils grew in the crevices and ate unsuspecting doodlers in the night with nary a mod the wiser. Sep 17, 2019', '176. ATEN. The dark web teemed with fixes. No one made too much but to wish for. Nothing was given to nothing for trying. Sometimes doodlers clicked and made nice for the cameras, but nobody made it to dry land. The sea was choppy and made newcomers sick at the onset. Jan 26, 2020', '177. (ᴗ͜ ʖ ᴗ) Squishy and lumpy, tendrilled  and bumpy. these are the lay of the land. Sweet and hot, not a thot. These are the claims of the lamb. Aug 12, 2019', '178. ┌┌ (┌^o^)┐ Damsels in distress and curtains for the foray. This creep really lets it all hang out. Under the sheets we keep sleet and candy. The ice tickles the wares and candy makes for a better hullabaloo afterward to catch up on the daily shadow knights and daily counterfeits. Nobody makes for merry chocolate dreams in the shallow pool of flux that whips around the makers and dancers in the plight. No more was he a fawn but a buck with antlers. Moseying along the grass dunes and sand pockets chomping on pinecones and nuts. Meandering with a glimpse of a shimmer in his eye with a disposition of disgust and thoughtfulness. No more at the rest he longed to run in the hunt with a cougar hungry with lust to snap the little ones neck and end all the hurt and pain. Gallons of time slushed by a turnstile built to measure the flux and wind a string around a pea. The machine wound like a spiral helix and jutted out at the top and bottom. Sep 19, 2019', '179. DAMN THOSE COPPERS. He wished for death on the regs. Times up and started without much of a hoopla anymore. The color had drained out of the flowers on the kitchen table of life. Times we abreast of current capitulation. The dog was beaten, and they were still taking turns on it. Such carnage. Such disregard for the pups say in the game of things. It was dark on a Wednesday. Oct 2, 2019', '180. ∞ The knight dusted off the study and went to werk. Stacking and mending boxes of his own in the midnights over fortnights of rabble and chatter. It was a thankless job but a job none the less. It payed the piper and the king and the royals. Knickknacks were on their way. Keepsakes. Holy eyes. Unremembered in a daze from too much weed and little sleep. Oct 3, 2019', '181. TOP TANGO. She was warm and gooey. Tastes like candy spiked with Adderall. Time flew by the seat of its pants and got along to a stop gap the miles wide with a hang-up. Nothing was written in stone, but the story was long and full of tendrils. It grasped the young ones by the short hairs and drug them around the kitchen table. Oct 5, 2019', '182. SHARKS. The punch-drunk love slut meandered drunk on the stuff. He bobbled over boxes and timepieces. The ether whipped and wrangled around local trees and shrubs. The leaves picked up in the tussle. Knobs and narys were his task now. For a goddess. A fix. A chameleon of wires and electricity. The time just stamped quartets on an oblique and a lineman kept a docket of the activity. Oct 8, 2019', '183. ANGLE THUMP: AN ECCENTRICITY. OFF BALANCE. Two ounces of blood at each checkpoint. Barcodes etched into the skin just above the wrist. A laser eye detection device to ensure identity. Scanned and dated and put into the back closet for mending and recommissioning. A total rebuild. Better. Faster. Stronger. Time galloped along a line written in the sand. The dust blurred the line and judges raised flags to the infraction. Oct 8, 2019', '184. SHOOK. The light flooded in the window apartment and lit up the knobs and narys. They laid about and began to pile up for a lack of organization. The bully could whip up a frenzy in young merriment that would do laps around the stations turnstile. Whipping the young lad was more fun than sleep and the two got along okay outside a gaming cul de sac that ate up quarters like a rat with cheese. Oct 13, 2019', '185. NO MORE BATTERIES. Time stood still and table toppers took heed. The dust on the counter was in desperate need. Nothing added up to nothing and the dust was a deed; lamenting and crying only brought onlookers to the catastrophe. Abled was the fawn darting into traffic with nary a light to stop the stampede. Awash in blood and guts the spectacle juxtaposed with a turbulent time in the cosmos. When stars bleed ether to spectate a growing chasm of filth growing on the upper Eastside. Oct 14, 2019', '186. SUCK MY TIMER SCAM. Sometimes it up and grabbed him in the night. Like a stalker for a butler to giddy up the troops and walk the line in the sand. Glitter and trophies aflutter and a game genie in the pocket of a would-be doodler but all tallies go to a sheet off the record and kept at pockets dangling but not to sleep in embers of remembering to forget about the past and give a damn. To speak with tongue and write with passion in the night about someone or something too ephemeral to capture. Ether modules of coolant for the flux and fix juice that beat a heart so true to sweet Mary and Samantha and Kristina. The foxes. The soul suckers. The game cube. Sweet mistress drew upon the ink blotter and a screen followed out of the muck of colors and tapestry. Alone in the night the young doodler ogled at a new toy. Oct 15, 2019', '187. TABLE TENNIS. The game goop melted occasionally. Pipers of the political jargon touted the wares for devil may care and the wind whipped around cattycorners and roundabouts. The chameleons shape-shifted and contorted to the tune of a trumpet off key and in the distance. The rabble oozed and undulated with a rhythm saved for progressive metal shows and it got along okay on a Wednesday in the ether around an orb of rare metal and rock. Oct 17, 2019', '188. SHIRTS AND GOOGLES. She popped in and out of existence giving his life meaning. The lists of to- dos was the best part. It gave him a sense of purpose and meaning in a meaningless life. Mending and stacking boxes for an overlord got boring and he made do with her flights in and out of his radar. Time washed by like water and the dockets all filled up with markings of the tribulations of kings. Nothing mattered but he got along okay in the depths of madness and an inkling of remorse. Oct 22, 2019', '189. sin45 ゚= √2 ÷ 2. Things piled up. It was messy. No one got out alive. Flash-bangs and tear gas filled the rooms, and most were brought to their knees in the gasp of it all. People tapped out all the time. Processions of the fallen could be heard on the hilltops of trash and oil. Gold in those hills made for the manifest destiny of a fallen errand boy. Crash and bang were heard more often than not, and the dust settled after a fight broke out in the upstairs bathroom. Machine gun fire muffled in the distance and broke the calm of the fields that ran with wheat and game for the stalker. Doodlers drained into the pools of ether that ran around the land in circles around the mountains. Dec 1, 2019', '190. DBZ. The game got fancy at times. People tussled their trousers. Names were called. It was anarchy. No one trusted anyone in a game of chance and fortitude. She shined excellence in a dull room. No one comes close to her beauty, grace, and charisma. The lights glimmered for a monastery and the sky was a blood red. Oct 23, 2019', '191. NEAR SIGHTED FAR REACH. Night brought chilling dares and shifty cares. Nobody cared about anybody in the guff. Tops of tables dripped salt. It was the fixes blood and it poured all over the place and the boxes just held the stuff. Not long. Young doodlers ate the stuff like candy and called everyone an eyesore. Oct 27, 2019', '192. V●ᴥ●V Nobody kept track in a maze of candy and marbles. Doodlers were a many and the ghettos oozed with fixes. Under the chair a dog huddled under his coat in arms with a deadly grin. Smog pottles. Candy dares. Undulation. The markets swarmed. Oct 30, 2019', '193. ! つ ◕o◕ "つThe world made sense as it should. Things played out to familiar crescendos and finales. The deck was stacked, and the dealer was a devil masquerading as a call girl. She dealt dirty decks and dipped in the dank destitute summer. Time echoed a familiar song of remembrance and coal. Takers lined up for the doodlers to etch caricatures of the tourists. No one remembered the lone anarchist. He was draped in common tinsel and left to his own devices. A can of spray paint lay at his feet and the doodlers asked a fix for some money. Oct 24, 2019', '194. SHAMBLES. He adopted what he could find that was good and earnest. The wind just whipped around in a cyclone of filth and violence. It made it tough to walk another day in the downtrodden malaise he had grown accustomed to. It was worn like a jacket too short in the arms and too big around the gut. She flashed into his mind on Tuesdays, Thursdays, and Saturdays when the mending and stacking of boxes was boring or the days tripping of the clock walked across the face of the box. Oct 27, 2019', '195. BAKA. Time and time again the system upstarted and chortled from discomfort. It was being written but you didnt have to like it. Time was always a marching wingman around in circles to keep ourselves merry and without malcontent. Underneath the floorboards beat a heart of fallen comrade. Beaten and left for dead in the catacombs of a fortress now drenched in slow death to keep us warm in the nights and nights and nights in this place. Away and kept at the same time. Ready and aghast. Yellow and a belly. Tried but not true. Nov 7, 2019', '196. (シ_ _)シ Victim of the scam. Torn a heart still beating flux and candy for the brain. What to do with this game? Losers pile up. Slaves are born. Werk never makes sense in a cataclysm of white noise and limericks of old sweet dad in the nights of melancholy disposition in the growth of a man in a world gone mad with greed. Cash pigs and ATMs line the street. What is a man to do to find his long-lost love in the depths of madness at the houses deck? Nov 2, 2019', '197. @(◕x◕)@ The time went on again in increments better suited for masters. The table filled with salt from the miners. It spilled into piles that mice would creep up and taste and go mad with the stuff. Broom and dustpan the slaves kept the room tidy and free of boxes for mending and counting in the morning. It bled together in the sky and we wept for better times with the masters afar. To serve and be pointful at an errand. To gasp with air to flux the lungs of a wary traveler searching for ladies and times with them against the backdrop of a gloomy future. Tossed aside and beaten the crybaby licked his wounds to fight another day against the masters of allegory and time. Nov 6, 2019', '198. (∩`- ́)⊃━炎炎炎炎炎 Time ticked on like a woodpecker beating its head against a board. It repeated and pierced the ears to split a log, but keepers jotted down notes in the gasp of it all. Nothing was spared. Catalogues a plenty piled up and were needed for mending and placing in orderly fashions to keep back the sheer weight of the salt fields in the depositories. Everything fell apart at the wheels. Nothing was kept working. Only clocks kept time and the brooms and dust pans made a muddled sound against the backdrop of titans spitting game. Which shit stank worse? File that under "Foxtrot" and bend a knee to get a better stance on something so unfamiliar as free thought. To the text they were bowers. They made nice and tended a field of crops that fed the doodlers that wake in the night without remembering themselves against the dreadful weather. Why were we so lost in counter culture gobbldy gook? What was so cool to them last night when we dreamed of sweet Mary and forgot about our troubles for a night in the gasp of ecstasy. Nov 11, 2019', '199. TICKETY BOO. The stuff piled up like trash on the beach. Sucking the life out of the fauna. It took spouters to the top. They kicked their plans and spat the rhetoric of peace and promises that never added up in the end. Nothing made sense because the energy of direction was lost in the wee hours of the morning. Promises made doodlers weary and tired with led in the eyes and carrying gravitron bracelets. Boxes spit fixes around the fire and schleppers grated the time gap with majors of sleight of hand. The stalker hovered with knife and ginny to lop up the napping doodlers at the pools of ether. Nov 11, 2019', '200. BOSHY TIME. And then it was boshy time. Time held still but young table-toppers took heed. The salt was on the table and the table was being flipped. Things were a real sticky wicket, but they got along okay. The flipping had begun last yesteryear and the salt lay all across the floor for hours. A lick? For funzies they said boshy and got weak with the stuff. Umbrellas couldnt keep the children safe from the sheer weight of it all. The salt had been specially fabricated to taste sweeter than actual table salt, but people still died from over-stimulation on the weekends. "Mods" were needed to make sure shovel loads of the stuff didnt clog the conveyor belt system that shipped it in. Every Thursday night at 3:14 a new salt depository was commissioned, and it was shipped by a young whippersnapper by the name of L0Ljk. Young L0Ljk made it clear that the salt would be kept safe. Safe from the dirty table-flippers of yester weeks. Dec 2, 2019', '201. ITALIAN. Then the brigands set in. Nipping at your coat tails. Gnawing on bones in the courtyards to keep time abreast of the situation at hand. Building and stacking of boxes for the chewing of time. Boxes boomed beats and fixes cropped up out of thin air. The tempo was fast and jittery like a hobo waiting for a fix. Time oozed out of the ether and was collected in turnstiles that moved it to different locations at a familiar pace. Nov 12, 2019', '202. ●.◉ Dancing only felt good in the moonlight. Dead and fallen leaves on the ground whipping up in a cyclone alone in the fields of our dreams. With pixies and damsels in the grasp of melancholy hearts amongst the wheat farms. Grasping and groping in the shimmer light and dancing hypnotically to nonexistent ribbons of a beat too shy to tamper about. Nov 17, 2019', '203. TRIPPING OUT. The revolution was on hiatus. No one showed up to the meetings and the darlings had lost interest. Everything was awash in the moonlight with a cloudy overcast that sprinkled rain to whet the appetite. He was drenched in slow death; a symptom of the sickness that walked upright and darned a smile. Nov 19, 2019', '204. HAPPY FEET. An echo chamber of pain Down the sink into the drain Never about something the same Always under another name Dragging out the game Rain on the windowpane Never alone, never again. Nov 20, 2019', '205. SHOGUN. The games started to dig really deep and drown a man in his dreams. Dreams of sweet Erica and Samantha in the sheets with whips and chains. Darting their eyes to the directions of their hearts and losing themselves in the gasp of it all. No stone left unturned. The mark just coexisted with titans of the type. Jotting down notes in the night to keep himself spry he lost all recollection of a normal life in the game. To tout and spit was the best of the lot. Keeping abreast of current situation of the house with a split 21. Nov 21, 2019', '206. JUST IN CASE. Sometimes you just got erased in someones hard drive. What to do with yourself in the night and nights and nights in this place of drivel and candy. Writing to no one and bleeding all over the place. Slaughtered and tired the game wrapped up with crescendos and finales at the points. It really tied the room together. It was a piece for another set and was lost in the move to new towns across a nation. Nov 22, 2019', '207. MACINTOSH. Roses are red, violets are blue. What is up my dude, who is who? They play in the shadows and dart in the night; they make up stories and weep and they fight. Asleep now for dreaming and making better of the world. Asleep but forgetting to keep spry for the girls. Never a dull day the rabble makes such sweet songs in the nights and nights and nights in this place. Placate the marksman or the traveler of mountains and waters brackish with the monsters of the deep and creep to someone not so lost as you in the backlash of an entertainment generation. Lollipops and candies are sweet, and they knock you into a stupor of the game. Too tired for playing makes you frustrated with loins of a camper. Doodle in the limelight of your box and make merry for the cameras or they will dash your dreams with the reality of your actions. Take no solace here; rules dont add up in your favor in the long run. Nov 24, 2019', '208. FOIST. Tippy tappy for sticky taffy is all they ever knew. The god makers. The stalker with ginny and knife to up and take us to our maker for nights to make ado. The game was afoot and nary was the wiser. Apr 26, 2020', '209. UWU. The street lined with sugar babies and weed whores a line around the corner. The story was drenched in slow death with a calm of the ages. Nothing made sense in a slurry of goop that just attracted the negative particles to a space in light and dark made to spin perpendicular to the axis of rotation. Dec 2, 201', '210. SQSHY. Tumultuous times. Brigands at the ready. Computers at the wipe point. When do you tap out? What game is too much? Shall we dance or rock to the beats of oboes and tambourine? Game day is just upon us and we cant think of anything to wear to commemorate such a joyous occasion. Nazi gunfire rifles the doodler awake and upon the box at hour of nigh. Too choked from cigarette smoke to get too high. Made upon the gamers day we danced with stars in the sky momentarily and with tap shoes. Nov 30, 2019', '211. (つ ̆◡ ̆)づ♥ It was time on a clock not too far from the center. It made a cyclone and whipped everything in a circle. It made for a difficult eye on the lay of the land. Dec 3, 2019', '212. ”][" {()} {()} }]_ Nothing made sense and spare ends gathered up in the distance. They built a monument to the ad nauseam and groups of doodlers were seen protesting the titans. No one knew who to believe in a storm of words and ideas that bleated on radio stations around the corner. Today a young man acid realized that all matter is merely energy condensed into a slow vibration, that we are all one consciousness experiencing itself subjectively, theres no such this is death, life is only a dream and we are the imagination of ourselves: heres Tom with the weather... Nov 27, 2019', '213. ヾ(o`ε ́o) Pay pigs and cash cows lined up in the streets and it masked a longing for it to make sense what to do among the titans. What was the story? Where was the hook? Did it take time or did time take its damnedest to wrap up another song to be recorded on rolodex? Are we wrapping a present? Too fragile to tempt the stalker in the night and doodlers all around to mop up the smell. Nov 28, 2019', '214. \(-/ Lock-picks got you in. They held all the valuables there. A treasure trove. We ogled and played nice. They chatter like hyena on the Serengeti and we hunt with spears made from real life dreams. Up and snatched by a mad mathematicians gaze and shuffled into a theorem of sorts. The book. The temple. The rubies. The chambermaids. The lost sense of loneliness inside a think tank overgrown in the steeples. Jul 25, 2019', '215. (◕_◕ ✿)DONT FOGET TO SOAK PANCAKES IN PLENTY OF WARM SYRUP AND BUTTER Kick the bucket and give us a chance to play. The games arent much but they keep us spry in the night and nights and nights in this place. A fortress of solitude to meander the fields and take heed of the land. To place crop and grow a food stuffs for an army of psychopaths and Rembrandts for to feed your mixing station of memes and art. What do you need now? A tower built up so high it collapses under its own weight or a plane that can do curly cues around corners in the basement. Jolly lads dont grow over night. Sadness creeps into the bones of a doodler and drags them down like the weight of mercury rising to the top of a thermometer. Bots and spammers cloud the view of any real progress in the chess match of life. They take from the many what cannot be borrowed or transferred to the banks of granite and gold. Take time with young doodlers and help them grow into stalks of compassion and fortitude to survive the storms and tidal waves of Armageddon to wash away this filth of the eons. Hyperbolic motor cars that drive on roads of flux and dance to the tune of a drummer boy on acid. Space vehicles to dash the distance of habitable zones of colonization and startup capital for the time wasters. The box generation. The fix cycle. The combustion engine. The guard rail and hes off the road into a thick brush. Now the lights flicker on and a loudspeaker comes over the auditorium for all to remain calm in light of present composition of the light show. A glimpse of a tell-tale heart under the floorboards of the coliseum. All was wrapped up in the bout. Names were called. Ties were wound. You could hear the sound of ripping in the sheets. Nothing was healed that day. Minds still all a flutter with days torn apart at the seams. A grey washed over the sun and made to walk with heavy feet and sweaty palms from nerves. Dec 3, 2019', '216. (ノ≧∇≦) ミ ┻━┻ Games were all they were. Nothing changed. No promises were granted. No parade ran the streets. Somehow the world still hated itself and picked on the weak ones; the ones that wouldnt speak up to the abuse. It was anarchy and the hot ones loved it. Dec 3, 2019', '217. TURTLE TOP. It got to be an existence. A lighthouse in the storm of words and lies broadcast on the boxes nightly. Other fixes popped up, but they died out in the rabble as traps for the fallen hearted. Heads bobbed to the rhythms that let out in the night and tributaries led to streams which led to waterways that fed to oceans. The time oozed by like a candles wax down the shaft. It pooled in the handle of the candelabra and spilled onto the table. It cooled like the ether in spots of idle. Stars and solar systems circled a flat earth and the gay parades marched on in the day. Dec 8, 2019', '218. SHACKLES. The night danced like a top. Spinning and weaving new beginnings to old tales and nightly checkups on psychopaths. The dreams were different and spilled into the land for young doodlers to gulp up. The stalker walked with a limp because his ginny sack was full of giddy come uppers. They fed his insatiable appetite for the kink in the hose of life. It stopped up the ether that flowed between me and you for eons and built up the stars and moons in galaxies far away from the space betwixt the molecules in our time. Lightyears and solar systems wrapped around a donut that fed into itself several times and did a loopdy lou around the center. Trillions of neutrino dust molecules poured into the box and fed its peculiar spins. The dwarf stars and suns shined their powerful pull upon the space betwixt and we danced like a music box ballerina. Dec 8, 2019', '219. <(°^°)> What was real? Where were the boundaries? Was this world made out of thin air or did it call upon a long-lost art of sleight of hand and parlor tricks? Decks in the night on a call girl drenched in sweat and money until the last play runs. Out of thin air the night calls to a brigand to bring more boxes and food stuffs for mending and stacking for the rabble. They need in such a way that slacks the mind from building and stretching of doodles in the night with sweet Mary and Amelia. Drenched in something more than the angels of the net so giddy with their new toy. Dec 9, 2019', '220. LOCKED AND LOLED. A wash with it and measuring to the millimeter in an imperial march of decimals and angles contrary to regular thought of spatial longitudes and latitudes for a fortnight in a fortress away from sweet Samantha. Mary at the bar to take us away with each other and no one made promises when nothing added up on dockets running high with uncertainty. The ghosts lingered and play mattered less than a satchel of marbles as we dipped in the ether into a pool of light and energy too liquid to make any notice of it. A sphere circled a datum of eccentricity about the axis of a ship lost in a sea of neutrinos and stardust the eclipsed the sun and moon in a better way for the stars to shine. Mar 30, 2020', '221. REST AND RELAXATION. Things changed languages. New titans pulled weight on the story and it was getting good. A tower built up in the distance and promised of sacrifice of the virgin and blood to soak the masses. A glass stalker walked with thee and you and me and we felt so free in giddy and glee. Dec 9, 2019', '222. EASTER ISLAND. He got kicked in the head. Left for dead. Another errand boy. Numbers ran, they pitched the scam, and everything got along okay. Knocking of boots; a shoot and scoot. Nothing was different today. Incandescent lights, party night fights. They got a new toy. Feb 4, 2020', '223. ! つಠ益ಠ" つ ─=≡ΣO)) Midnight came and went. He dreamt he was the healer. The type caster. The brigand. Stacking and moving boxes for his own amusement in the dreary existence. It toppled a skyscraper in the distance with its aura. The piano keys lashed out to take hold of the ground and wrap it up in something light a burrito of light, dust, and cannon fodder for the masses. The lights flickered and an errand boy took the shield and spun it around so fast it made a sphere of protection. Fortitude for the rabble and kings around to take heed. No one in need. Chicken feed. The little girl peed. Dec 10, 2019', '224. (∩^o^)⊃━☆ ✿✿✿✿✿✿He was a mouse in a web of candy. The sweetness overtook him, and he fancied a taste. Weak with the stuff he ambled around back alley and got a glob from the artwork facility in a heist situation overseas. The Italians had griped about citizenship and caused an uproar in the legal avenues of legal employment by the means of computational design. A bored dog pants. He draws lines on the stratosphere in peculiar ways to fend off the night. The stalkers and doodlers work in the night and cause such a vacuumous sound around the mountains and plains. Dec 14, 2019', '225. TM. The gems collected in the corners of a city bound apartment. The drapes kept out the light of the day and the songs kept kiddies abreast of current play. Dice skipped in the courtyard and money changed hands. The brigands counted stacks and doodlers lined up for the chance to play. Time ticked and darts were thrown at the boards in the distance. Nothing made a difference to the clock waxing and waning in the courtyard. It told the time of the tracts of land in the distance. To an end not so withstanding to be held in night. To the keepers it was safe. Dec 15, 2019', '226. NICO. So, he built skyscrapers in the sandcastle. The kids werent alright. They dreamed of kiddie porn and poppers. They kicked dirt on one another. The game got nasty. It took table toppers to the throws of ecstasy and spell check could barely keep up. The legs wobbled. The cache was full. Cookies for the monsters and they got weak with the stuff. Salt poured in from the conveyor belts and piled up in cyclical formations and the rabble formed around in a splendor. Doodlers up right beside stalkers and brigands around to take up the gems and keepsakes. It was a mine of despair. A suicide watch with captains on the phone. Youngness was a spectacle, and the old ones drew breathes of the melancholy drab to feel younger than they were. It seemed like something someone could dash in a fit of rage; fragile and convex. The piano played softly and in drew a precarious picture on the pit of palsy. Dec 22, 2019', '227. (°ロ°) The darkness up and swallowed things in its path. The dogs lapped up a mac and cheese dinner with tablets in it to ward off evil spirits. Times became dark and abreast of withering in the distance as a titan shriveled in the spectacle of the masses. Nothing promised was delivered. No one shared a day of remembrance to the fallen soldiers in the tussles of the muscle. Day dockets tallied for the house in a ramshackle of noise to drown out the setting of the sun. Dec 25, 2019', '228. (=^·ω·^=) She was a goddess draped in rubies and pearls. So delicate and delicious the sugar dripped off her fingertips in the nights and nights and nights in this place, a demon cave full of monsters and goblins. She promised long nights of cuddles and massages to pass the pains of life. A task fit for a king. So precious. So perfect. A messiah. The gods birthed her from gold and diamonds in a star furnace out in the outer reaches of space and shipped by star fleet commanders of the cosmos. Lucky to have seen such a creature while he was still alive and dream of her in the night and nights and nights in this place. Jan 5, 2020', '229. NOOBS. New nobs grew in the fields. Players grasped them for something stationary in a world whizzing by a breakneck speed. The tally ran for the house and parties died down around 2am. The brigands ran side gigs around the corner and a call girl sneezed with a peacock feather to rouse some doodlers to excitement. Nothing was collected for a ghost run in the night. Something of a skirmish for players to take notes and read book ends. Jan 16, 2020', '230. FBI. Sometimes wed get sick of the regurgitation and gulp down a pulse of vomit in the gasp of it all. Staying back sickness the monitors hummed and the cooling fans kicked on a supercomputer hacked by Chinese scientist to run Boolean matrices for the alt-right. Numb with pain the machine careened in an outward spiral towards calamity. Nothing added up to humanity in the gobbldy gook that life spat out and mathematicians ran numbers for their own amusement. Time spiraled breathlessly out of control as synapses collapsed and ran to differing locations of the brainchild of modern science. Jan 16, 2020', '231. COPY COPY. The game ran on into nights around the globe. Tantrums and knock outs. It got to be entertaining were it not for the orb of filth growing in the hills. It fed the workers dirt in water and electrolytes. The germs grew out of the mud and the makeshift feeding tubes got clogged occasionally. No one knew how to eat otherwise so it made for a bad time. Chat was somewhere to be cuddled. Told your dreams were just that, figments of the imagination. A leader draped games upon the green screen and doodlers played nice for the recorders. Jan 19, 2020', '232. MAKING BABIES. The need was there. No one cared. The dreams were spared. No one cared. It was a cyclone of money and drugs for the rabble. It pooled into swamps for the giraffes that ate at the treetops. Chat talked in circles and made a messy partner in the moonlight behind a keyboard writing the rules and walking of the gods. Valuables spilled onto the floor and there was a kerfuffle for dominance in the streets. The game went on with players guessing who was who and what shit smelled sweeter. Dec 26, 2019', '233. ᄋᄉᄋ OH HULLO DERE. Welcome to my dungeon. The whips and chains were bought out by Nigerian scammers on writing binge. Candy and cuddles are aftercare. Twitch dates with the up and coming cyber dommes and sub trains in the brainchild of a bit boss. ShadbaseTV for the hardcore. Chat should be game related when in doubt. Its a more of the mindfuck for me as I like to weave allegory. Take heed of safety dances and protectors. Tis a scary world out there of psychopaths and madmen so dont say I didnt warn you. Tap out when you deem it necessary to your gumption and startup. No one will tell you your limits. You must find them on you own in this unforgiving place. I see very little hand holding that account to more than a trick deck in the pocket of a con man. Nothing is sacred here; to each their own. I cannot tell a man he cannot know himself more than he knows others. I cannot tell a girl that guard down is not a way to meander through life. I will walk with you down shady alley to grasp the locket you so wish to have if your life decides to walk with me, sweet ENSENSE, for one day in this place of lies and broken glass. Of death and walking alone. Forget the day with me in this place I have built for us to be together and grow like a tree in the rock and water at edge of the abyss. Take my hand and let me lead you to the things you long for at waters edge. Make me whole again to lay beside you and sigh. Jan 26, 2020', '235. MISHAPS. He said no She said yes It was a bit Like a game of chess Yes and no Scratch and blow The tributes piled up There werent two girls Just one cup She didnt act willingly The scarf hung diligently Just off her hip Just one sip And the night was called ado. Aug 23, 2019', '236. ._. It was a building of diamonds and gold. Being built and commissioned by the mad mathematician with an itch for the abnormal. Tidying up the corners of a single bedroom apartment in the city away from the geese and pigs. The damsel lay on the floor; dainty and downtrodden. The knight fending off demons in the study with pen and paper. Jan 19, 2020', '237. 巴 Ducks were in a row and there was a sniper in the bushes. The night trickled in. Brigands had set up camp in the clocktowers and the dark was brushing into the skies. Starlight glimmered in the distant galaxies and neutrinos flooded the outer reaches of space betwixt molecules so distant they held solar systems between them. Critics bleated critiques and the rabble mooed in unison. No one figured out the mess. It was draped across the tapestry and filled up the night air with a drum beat. Changing the channel was a jumpstart and chortle that grasped at the short hairs of a young traveler. Everyone was up in arms, but they werent sure about what. Jan 26, 2020', '239. 習慣 USED TO IT. And here were the beggars. The wanters of the change in your pocket. The scrappers of the barrel of life. Making ends meet with spare parts and firewood. Keeping study in candlelight. The stalker walked round and nipped a few at the necks and drank the blood from the still pumping heart. Nodding and agreeing the doodlers made nice and the spectacle was an evening muse on the tele. Dec 29, 2019', '240. ▼·ᴥ·▼ The walls never climbed up so high. Experts dissecting an old cadaver and finding gems amongst the organs. Tied of with dental floss and moved around to make room for the rubies. Hiding whole heads of lettuce in the rib cages. Gold in them there hills. Jan 15, 2020', '241. DOWN PERISCOPE. He crept in for morsels. Just to tide over the days alone without his mate. It made for a drab existence of little escapades amongst the stars. Nobody was keeping track of an errand sheet overtaken by the left in a scramble for safety in the world without walls. Cyber scapes grew in the distance corners of the tabletop game. The masters kept mark for the lame ones, and they gathered together in the candlelight. Mar 7, 2020', '243. SPECTATOR SPORT. The edge was a weird place. Things popped out corners empty and alone. The lights flickered from power waves and the goop just moistened in the globs of solder than ran together a makeshift turnstile. The amber waves of grain were shimmering. Showing the notes and scribblings of time wasters and medicine men. The rubrics cube solved in various formations for the spectacle of onlookers. Of mice and men. Oct 4, 2019', '244. (^_^)ノ┻━┻ The games poured through the ceiling of an east street apartment. Credit card numbers and bitcoin wallets were thrown around like pocket change and the doodler was licking his lips in anticipation. What mac and dos black sheets had he gotten pinned on for tribulations of the pay pig game? What workplace rules had he ignored in finding a pen pal to ride out the storms of the nights at a monitor clicking and typing to no one in the pangs of anxiety bouts. How would our hero come out on top in our next episode? Feb 15, 2020', '245. WE REGRETTI THE SPAGHETTI. We write for success. Clay-bots digest. Nothing suggests. More upsets. Nothing but regrets. Sometime enough said. Just read the wheat bread. (its good bread) The cyber thieves made way with the case in arms and fled the art district post-haste with little but an overcoat and hat on a cold night in the space betwixt the molecules that danced upon the face of a person forgotten in time. Juxtaposed with a backdrop of progressive failures in the office of the way maker. Foul balls and scam jobs ran the numbers, and we sank into a depression within the framework. Now just peanuts for the makers and doodlers and sex workers and junkies and out of body-ers. Nobody kept tabs on an errand sheet that listed the ins and outs of babys cares and grocery list and the spires built up higher in the cities and towns near thoroughfares. Night crept in a doodler thought off into the distance. What had he done to his family just for his spare apartment of bookends? What had they needed instead of a wounded duck? Should not boxes and mending be needed for their upkeep to weather the storms to come from nights and nights and nights in this place? Mar 14, 2020', '246. THE DREAM IS CANCELLED. The broken watch lay on the table. The cogs and springs lay around and it looked like a murder. Dark web clientele moved in the distance and scrambled together bookends and coffee table books to commemorate the dismantling of a behemoth. Salt depositories filled up with the stuff and werkers started carrying excesses home in backpacks. The streets were aglow with ecstasy and the children geeked over candy and comic books on the live streams. No one could keep the stream generation under their thumb long enough to topple a nation of excess and pearls. Quarantine and fear of the once sought-after death kept doodlers in a limelight of turpentine and whiskey to wash away the thoughts of hopelessness and lonesome. Cyberspace trickled a sense of humanity at turnstiles and campers lapped the stuff up like candy. Mar 28, 2020', '247. TABLE TALK. Sometimes the lab shot back. Bookends and taffy made for strange bedfellows and he dreamed of a better company. Its just that the lab made mountains out of mole hills. It built skyscrapers in the distance and they towered so high no one could guess the atmospheric conditions at any given level. Gunners took shop at the corners of decency as we careened off course in a ship over filled with armory rations. One spark on the deck and the sea would be awash with sailors dead from the explosion. No one knew where it was written but the campers were following instructions. Their movements could be mapped and charted in diaries for making of bookends and tarry nobs. The trinkets for making your way in this maze of emotion and e-girl spam. Little cocoons formed in the corners and made a rustling when the wind blew around the block. If the campers had a playbook it was surely one to make a mess of the lot. Spinning effortlessly the rock formation fell in line of the orbit of Titans moons and the next solar system had a flux of neutrinos enter through a black hole in the center of rotation. Apr 1, 2020', '248. (ノ͡͡ °͜ ʖ͡ °)(┻┻ Its hard to write science that never get read. The progress reports lay dreary and real-world mechanics usually squash any progress toward real scientific progress. Its a lot of learning. I learned the best thing I ever did was ride my bike to all my classes. Took care of body. This thing that needs cleaning. Now I bide my time between stupors of sleeplessness. The thing could write itself. "He banged between direct servitude and driven success. He touted a familiar story of climate change that grew dreary among the readers. Too much blanket statements and no funding for the think tank that grew in a mad mathematicians dream sleep. He just dreamt it up because he could. He had no real science besides the numbers and he just rushed it to the tattle tale stage where no real progress is made. Why do we punish the brink pushers for their lackadaisical mathematician sense of just crunching the numbers for heavens sake? A game of chance and left to the darting few of mad men that chose to write." Apr 28, 2020', '249. NO BOOFING. He dared to whisper into the night when seldom was awake or sober. He painted pictures of kaleidoscopes and candy dreams with lollipop pens. Sign away your life with me on the dotted line and be akimbo to the wares of a jackal taking what he can handle on little more than whiskey, tobacco, and coffee. A dream wanderer in the clockwerks of doodlers and campers and stalkers to take them all to the final resting place amongst the stars and the oceans and the flux spheres of neutrino bursts throughout our galaxies. The game was a new one; with traps and tendrils to wind a wire around tree roots to build a spire of the best and of decency. Of the game coming to an end and tabulators and numbers to root out the victor in a slot machine for the gods. Mod gods. The editors. The refiners of your search. The pen books. Notes on the corners and pass codes written in ciphers. No one knew when the game would end but they played so effortlessly. Drop a line into a rolodex of names and call signs to try your luck at the clusterflux that drew around the boxes in the garden. Apr 6, 2020', '250. OSTRICH. Writing got to be a chore to do on the weekends and hold up sleepless stopgaps that drew on like a spurt of silk from a spiders what who its. Dreams of real and fake mashed into a pot and it was being boiled. Hot bubbles of light danced into a rolodex of formations, all tabulated and tallied on other rolodexes for safe keeping of the time fortress. Datums arose out of the space and arranged themselves into military formations for the spectacle in the nights and nights and nights in this place. Apr 19, 2020', '251. OPAL HUT. The market was wet with tom foolery. Chinese spies to up and take the booty a young pirate had squirreled away. Seas were choppy. Westward winds blew around and the East held the queens. Fairies that danced and whipped their hair to and fro. Candy lined their lips and the ether eeked from their bodies. May 12, 2020', '252. NEKO. Mucky waters at the writers den. What to pen? Who to name? When to tap out and give the can another kick for kicks sake. What super race do believe should be running the racket of a game forgotten down the drain? They bleed their wares on the tele and I fancy an anarchist slant for forgotten Marys. Do it the best you can about yourself and pay attention to the unwritten rules of gameplay to make a masterpiece. Art breeds art and so on so try to make a spectacle of yourself to happy the cameramen and tippers. Make a better match to your inner self and wax eloquent on daily howsabouts. Muse. Shadowbox the demons that engulf yourself beside a war chest. Bet the boat and sailors will fall out of the ends. Writing breeds a sense of community. Putting up with the bickering makes for a bigger pool. Is your open eye all seeing or just putting on the ritz for the opposite sex? Build the spire. Toil to no end for something ephemeral and fleeting just because they told you couldnt. The games got boring in nights of sleeplessness and jotting down thoughts kept him akimbo to self-growth and learning of the ropes. Protocol oozed out of these demons like water filling a bathtub. Lapping the stuff up. Taking buckets back to comrades in the night for filling of canteens and Nalgene. It is the life blood of a content life in the sea of lost souls and hackers. The dark web promised slaves and candy corn for the children. Everyone so close to the pulse of the spirit of the 70s and everybody scrambles over the young ones in the pile. Stalkers nipped up young doodlers in the night and no one batted an eye. Devil in the details. May 10, 2020', '253. <(*°8°*)> Priests and jackal set up post on fronts on free thought to the building for a better future. Campers and doodlers pitched their wares and game was afoot on all corners of the playing field. A laser show and discoteca DJ danced notes and shimmering lights for the onlookers in a spectacle of it all in the small corner apartment in space betwixt the molecules of neutrinos that fluxed through our space to give gravity to it all. Mar 29, 2020', '254. SHITBOX. Feelers out he nabbed and tarried at appropriate places. None the wiser to the formula rising that added up to marbles for malarkey. It was a drab existence. Of just subsisting on digestible tidbits and morsels for the game afoot. Doodlers and campers set up shop in the box communities and wires and flux left the air a little less than complacent. The place was wet with communication but lacking in real human contact. Just a little off top and better along with yourself in community. What does it mean anymore? We joke and complain with each other in a data-sphere that advertisement dollars lap up at every pay turnstile. I like twitch. Its adolescent and new game territory. Sub and Dom games to keep you spry and fight with copypasta-ers. Take control of the voice calling out nomenclature and spirits. Type up a storm of words to cripple the next person that stumbles across your dark barren basement to keep limelight on the voices in akimbo with the rabble. Anger and discontent for current situation of hard days above and beyond. At a ship on wayward seas made choppy from the squalls that kicked up in the limelight. Nobody cared about the muck building up in the tributaries. The solid waste. The maglev trains. The supercomputers. It took time to type for the sticky taffy that swept you away. It built up like a skyscraper. Towering over the ground in a sticky way. Candy and sweets made for a better partner in company of hive-mind that just bitched about how stupid men can be. Lapping for confectionaries that tickled the mind. May 5, 2020', '255. MAKIN MILK. Im a little tired and overworked. Fed up with babysitting the kids and I dont clean up so well. Just give me my prescription drugs and money for my time and art that I give without warranty. Im done taking care to watch my tongue and cleaning up my toys. Just let me live my life the way that I can with what skills I can muster. Dont expect me to write out a solution to the problems you find with life at your doorstep. They were here long before me and time will take care of us all in its own way. I dont speak. I just tippy tappy occasionally when the mood strikes me. I cant make everything jelly beans and Fanta for the cameras on a dime. I suck. I sleep. I dream. Just banish me to some modest center city apartment with warm water and a bed and I will kick the can when I dont feel sick with the trash and fighting in the streets. Feb 17, 2021', '人', '。 • ﾟ 。 . ඞ. . . 。 。', '巴', 'ヽ(ﾟ´Д`)ﾉﾟ', 'o-[·o·]-o尸', '▒▒▓█▇▅▂∩( ✧Д✧)∩▂▅▇█▓▒▒', '(❁´▽`❁)*✲ﾟ* ', '【○〇〓〇】ノ【〇〇】', 'ㅇㅅㅇ', '▼·ᴥ·▼', '(=^·ω·^=)', 'ᕕ( ᐛ )ᕗ', '(∩^o^)⊃━☆ ✿✿✿✿✿✿', '༼つಠ益ಠ༽つ ─=≡ΣO))', '(つ˘◡˘)づ♥', '(∩｀-`)⊃━炎炎炎炎炎', '@( ◕ x ◕ )@', '(シ_ _)シ', '☆(*^o^)乂(^-^*)☆', '(。··)_且 my coffee bot freezes 3.14159% of your milk (。··)_且', '༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ', '𝝿', '∞', '¯\_(ツ)_/¯ ', '(ᴗ ͜ʖ ᴗ)', '(ﾉ≧∇≦)ﾉ ﾐ ┻━┻', '┬─┬ノ( º _ ºノ)', '(◕_◕✿)🆂🅴🆇🆈🅱🅾🆈(◕_◕✿)', '(◕_◕✿)O`RLY', '(ﾟдﾟ≡ﾟдﾟ)', 'ᕙ༼*◕_◕*༽ᕤ', 'ʕ •ᴥ•ʔ', '(ง •̀_•́)ง', '(._.)', '¯\(°_o)/¯', '(⊙.☉)7', 'ヽ༼ ಠ益ಠ ༽ﾉ ', '⊂(◉‿◉)つ', '(- _ -) zzz', '∠( ᐛ 」∠)__', '༼ง ◉ _ ◉༽ง', '(⇀‸↼‶)', 't( -_- t )', '┌┌ (┌^o^)┐', 'ლ(╹◡╹ლ)', 'Ænima', '._.', 'baka3', 'sata笑4', '別發出怪聲', '卡卡洛特', '中爆(中國的會爆炸)	', '┬┴┬┴┤(・_├┬┴┬┴']

console.log('(。··)_且');

});        

// Login to Discord with your client's token
client.login(token);
